The first sequence Berkeley shot was the "I Got Rhythm" production number, which was originally planned to come about three-fourths of the way through the picture, and Edens didn't like what he saw. "I'd written an arrangement of 'I Got Rhythm' for Judy," Edens recalled, "and we disagreed basically about its presentation. I wanted it rhythmic and simply staged, but Berkeley got his big ensembles and trick cameras into it again, plus a lot of girls in Western outfits with fringed skirts and people cracking whips and firing guns all over my arrangement and Judy's voice. Well, we shouted at each other and I said there wasn't enough room on the lot for both of us." (Edens exaggerated somewhat; there were no gunshots going off over Garland's vocals. Otherwise, he has a point; the number begins to sound like the gunfight at the O.K. Corral.)
Now everyone just needs to figure out how to incorporate content in the cloud, without hurting those businesses, he said.
In 2008, when I started writing my book When I was Joe, for teenage readers, it would have been difficult to find anyone more ignorant about teen fiction than than me.
There are many different causes of scalp itching but rebalancing the scalp is the only way to get rid of the major causes of itchy scalp. Learn more by reading how to balance the scalp.
A reader has written the following:
There are exceptions, of course. One thinks of Paul Ryan, primarily, but my own Congressman, Jim Jordan, also comes to mind. Jordan, as head of the Republican Study Committee, actually submitted to the House of Representatives a budget that was (gasp!) balanced.
“Don't be ridiculous!”
And before these next two photos I just want to tell the story behind the house. It is the most beautiful house I think I’ve ever seen. The man that built it wanted to build the perfect house for his fiancé, so he spent a lot of time and effort designing and working on the house—8 years! It must have been too long to wait because she ran off with someone else. I would’ve waited for this house. And the man that built it for me.
Have I mentioned how much I loved that car. There was an ache in my chest when I realized I was going to have to part with it.
We have been fed propaganda for many years and they get away with it.
"The more it’s spread the better," Rabbi Nahum said.
4/6 Slice has cheese, olives, and mushrooms
Man can never
I called the management team of Hunter Hayes. Three hots and a cot are for prisoners. Homeless children deserve more.
The initial goal of the Halloween Open House was to host a client-related event that was different and distinctive from the numerous holiday parties given to corporate clients by other vendors and industries during the months of November and December.
When it comes to conserving the country’s raptors, education is key – and that’s where Alpha and his buddies come in. These specially trained birds are used in daily flight displays to showcase their remarkable abilities, giving audiences a fascinating window into the world of these amazing avian acrobats.
Awesome with a capital AWE.
I was walking around my sister’s mall and thought, “You know what? This would be a good place to take some pics.” She (Colorful Sinister) has her main store Hooligan Streetwear here. She is also looking for people who would like the rent there. If you want more info just shoot her an IM. And if you want to take a look around the mall check the link here: Sinister Mall
I didn't tell her that no one has been allowed to call me Meggie since 1977.
2.)
Since 2009, the City of Brussels supports the fair by acquiring an outdoor sculpture for the improvement of the public space projects. Each year one of the artists participating in “Art in the City” is invited to create an outdoor sculpture for a specific public space for the city of Brussels. The artists in the exhibition are represented by galleries showing in the fair.
I keep succeeding to find more and more voice that speak of unity, love and harmony on this beautiful planet.
The inpsiration for this card came from the very talentend Joanna(or Asia) K and her post that looked back over 2011. I loved the colour combo and design on her June project and it gave me the push I needed to do this card. Thanks Joanna !
Naturally, I assumed she meant to say, "Liberty won't HELP me clean." The two girls had been working on cleaning their bedroom all. day. long. So I called into the other room, "Liberty, help your sister clean!"
On April 19 2011 .. 2 1/2 days BEFORE Lambert St. Louis was hit.. I issued this alert for LAMBERT AIRPORT DIRECTLY..
A study underway at the University of Alberta (UoA) may shed light on health effects that exposure to welding fumes and metal dust have on female workers in metalworking and electrical trades.
Schimmel MS, Fisher D, Schlesinger Y. Congenital cytomegalovirus infection. J Perinatol 2001; 21: 209-210.
Knowing that I was in awe of him, Freddie put me at ease and let me look at his trumpet while he demonstrated how he made the sound with his "embouchure". One moment during the concert that most memorable was when he took a solo on the Fender Rhodes electric piano. Cables stepped aside and Hubbard simply sat down and took the longest solo on the Rhodes. This must have been during one of those marvelous and long funk tunes that they would play at that time. (I think it might have been KEEP YOUR SOUL TOGETHER). While Hubbard's playing on piano wasn't of the perfection or proficiency of George Cables, it was astonishing to me that he would do that in the middle of the concert.
The oath, taken in front of lower house speaker Shwe Mann, states members will ‘safeguard and abide by the Constitution of the Union’ and ‘hold always in esteem (the) non-disintegration of the Union, non-disintegration of national solidarity and perpetuation of sovereignty.’
The Rakeback.com supplies much more rebates in comparison towards the other on-line poker playing sites towards the players for a set schedule which might be a week or perhaps a month. The players which are high volume players for them the particular rakeback rates are supplied by the dealers. You get a unique bonus once you play huge games frequently. This way you are able to bring more actual money by playing poker online.
2. Xagave, 2/3 cup.
He even convinced my husband to buy me a Batmomma costume. I haven't worn a Halloween costume in 20 years but I'll do (almost) anything for my little Batman. Last week at the market Dash told me all about Batman's habits.
I don’t feel good! I was dead asleep until 2:30pm. I have no clue why no one woke me up. Probably because they knew I needed the sleep. Or the escape. Maybe both. I actually got up to get my mid day (6pm) medication and when I looked out at the patio I had a minor meltdown. Remember how I spent every day for like 3-4 months on the patio? Well.. It’s kinda important to me that it doesn’t look like a 3rd world country. Ok, so that’s a slight exaggeration. It didn’t look that bad. But it wasn’t good!
Here's the other feminist conflict I had. I have noticed if you allow mature men the space to brag about their sexual encounters, sometimes they do. I can't disclose the location or the people. But 20 minutes into an innocuous conversation that began with the weather and minutiae we (me and friend) were sent roller coasting, unsolicited and for free, on a rather sexually explicit and detailed ride into Karachi Past. The Rock and Rolling late sixties of Pakistan. A time where the Excelsior rocked; strip clubs operated publicly and starlets from the West disrobed. Beautiful girls from cities in the heart of Punjab exercised sexual liberation; and were promptly driven back to small cities for fetus extraction by sober and responsible moms. And Zardaris did not control the level of venom in our hearts and on Geo - but were -- a kinda sweet, albeit landowning family, that lived atop Bambino cinema in a penthouse in an area that was wide and DHA like. Men fell for and married flight attendants in tight skirts. (Those were quainter times) The fight attendants turned out to be conniving, and took them to the cleaner charging 50K for a kiss and that too after being lawfully wedded - and used that money to feed starving family members.
Some are not so confortable. "Pole shift is serious business," said Frank Nitt, president of the Federation of Predictions, based in Sandswallow, Arizona. "If enough Poles shift quickly enough, the earth will slip on it axis. This will cause entire continents to move hundreds of miles in a few minutes or even seconds. We're talking tidal waves, instant creation of new moutains, locusts... the whole nine yards."
The Digital Challenge invites digital entrepreneurs to propose ways to work with The Irish Times. For those shortlisted there will be an eight week “getting to know you” period in which the startups can learn how to work with The Irish Times, and The Irish Times can learn how to work with them. If at the end of the eight week period a startup finds that it can use The Irish Times to reach new customers, then perhaps it will want to do a deal with The Irish Times that can help it grow its business. This is an opportunity to leverage The Irish Times Group’s several million unique monthly visitors.
The Five Boroughs Music Festival is an undertaking to which I'm admittedly partial. With (mostly) young artists, a wide-ranging repertoire, and lots of enthusiasm, their self-appointed mission is to bring creative classical programming to all of NYC. Loud cheers from this outer-borough blogger. Their latest project has been the commissioning of twenty songs, from twenty different composers, celebrating the city's architecture, history, and inhabitants... and even, wryly, its transit system. This has given rise not only to an acclaimed concert series, but also the festival's first recording.
For the two cards challenge, the themes for Card #1 is shabby/vintage and
In addition, according to counterterrorism experts in this report, Islamic terrorists blend in better with Mexicans than with Europeans, thereby enabling them to sneak into the U.S. across the southwest border. This Muslim cleric, for example, discusses how easy it is to smuggle a briefcase containing anthrax from Mexico into America, thereby killing at least some 330,000 Americans in a single hour.
If I could add just one tip however, and really this is an all-encompassing tip, it would be this: just say yes. If your default answer in college isn’t yes, then you’re going to be missing out on a whole lot of great opportunities and up with a whole lot of what-ifs. So your friend invites you to a party on a Thursday night but you know you won’t know anyone there, plus you’re pretty tired. Just say yes! You’re gaining nothing from staying home, you could be gaining new friends and a hell of a night if you go out. There’s a goofy event at the Bell Tower that you know is going to be lame so you’re searching for some excuse not to go. Just go! At worst it actually is lame, at best you turn out to have a great time. Where’s the risk in that? I could go on with the cliche examples here, but I’m sure the point is taken. So to anyone lucky enough to have another year or three left, get out there and say yes!*
Olive oil, salt & pepper to taste
Too High:
2) let all your characters speak in the same manner. Especially watch out that they don't all speak like you. :)
I learned that her son-in-law is way too interested in dogs for his own good and sounds like a real dick.
Let's hope you agree.
Remove from heat and stir in the water and cognac until smooth. Serve slightly warm or at room temperature.
by Paul Schissler
I’m feeling the desire to spread my wings and fly today, to get away from the cares and problems of the everyday world and enjoy a bit of nature. I feel a great need to relax and “commune.”
None of us are perfect. We need to help each other fight this war. I must admit that I have many times been saved from defeat by the loving interference of another Christian in my life.
BUT! I would first give this person a short summary of your book and say, "Is this something you'll enjoy reading?" You do NOT want to send your baby who hates your genre and only loves historicals. Make SURE they enjoy that genre first. another thing is to start looking for published authors who will endorse your book--not someone like your neighbor who may only have credentials
Keeping on top of her physical fitness over the holidays, Mandy Moore was spotted leaving a gym after working out in West Hollywood, CA on Wednesday (December 21).
I used PSSSSSSt, the dry shampoo when I didn’t feel like washing my hair. I was such a dirt ball.
To that effect, the episodes won't be page to page adventuring and action; in the best traditions of the mini-series, there will be episodes of contemplation and character building, just as there will be those big action set-pieces. The characters, I hope, will be intriguing and colourful. By concentrating on the relationships between the monks rather than being plot-centric I want the readers to care about these characters so when they arrive in the last two books, their emotions will already be invested. Which is important to me.
Until this month there were twelve titles in Little Toller's Nature Classics Library. Alongside 'The South Country' there's Adrian Bell's 'Men and the Fields', which offers a fascinating picture of rural England shortly before World War Two, and books by Richard Jefferies and WH Hudson. Oh, and Richard Mabey's 'Unofficial Countryside' is in there too, which, since Mabey is still very much with us, rather brilliantly connects past and present. The books are nicely-weighted, reasonably-priced paperbacks with beautiful covers and illustrations by artists who are also in some cases long-forgotten.
Drip drip, drop, drip, drip, plop, plop the sound of my tears, they cut no ice in this life you take what you get, the result of the throw a dice . Drag, drag, scrape,scrape clank that is the sound of the chain round my neck dragging along the floor to it length then it hurts as back it yanks.
1 genealogical
The cool thing is that the team at SuperBot was hand-picked by Sony. Each team member at SuperBot has talent taken all over the place such as guys that worked on games like UFC Undisputed, Mortal Kombat, and many other fighting games. You can kind of say that they’ve been purposely built to deliver a solid fighting game experience.
“So, instead of about 1.6 million square feet of development over the the Atlantic Center Mall–separate and apart from the square footage of the "Atlantic Yards" proposal–there will be approximately 1.25 million square feet of residential and commercial development over the Mall, sometime before 2010 according to FCR. The 328,272 square feet added to Site 5 increases the size of the structure over that parcel to 636,000 square feet of development.”DOUBLE DEALING While heralding Atlantic Yards, city & state officials quietly agree to let Ratner build atop adjacent sites
Tobin Tax – another revenue option that has increasingly been suggested since the financial crisis (it’s prominently mentioned in regards to the jobs bill, for example) is a Tobin Tax. A Tobin Tax, for those unfamiliar with the term, is a small tax on financial transactions (buying and selling stocks, bonds, currency, futures, derivatives, etc.), usually anywhere between .1 to .25% of volume (or in other words, a 10-25 cent tax per transaction). Because of the enormous volume of financial transactions that happen every second of every day, such a tax would generate about $100-150 billion per year, and would have a beneficial side-effect of decreasing market volatility by making rapid, short-term speculative transactions (also known as “churn”) more expensive.
A friend recently extolled the virtues of a new voice-activated i-phone feature whereby you can ask what the weather will be like, and then it tells you! ‘You used to have to go out and buy a newspaper. It took at least ten minutes. Now it takes ten seconds.’
So which is really the brightest star of these four? Are you ready for this? Polaris! That’s right – if you put all four stars at the same distance, Polaris would appear to be the brightest. Remember, that the lower the magnitude number, the brighter the star. In absolute magnitude, these four stars line up this way:
I sleep like a log, but Ian is an early morning man. He said the wind came through here and when he finally got up, huge snow flakes were falling. He estimates that we got an inch in about 40 minutes. I awoke to Narnia, but out came the sun and wiped out all the rain/snow and the itsy bitsy spider climbed up the spout again. That's the way we like our snow. It's not the first day of February that we had expected, but under the circumstances, I'll take it.
cracked in crater-places
material and certificates. By the time we finished, it was almost dark (no lights, of
The other thing that didn’t win Stacey many votes was her cut-eye, witch-face after receiving bad reviews… girl, you gotta work the camera. People don’t liek a pouter, at all costs, smile.
in what today
And in March, I gained about 4 pounds. For no reason that I can pinpoint. Talk about frustrating. It went up as much as 10 pounds and then back down a bit, but never back to the low I had hit in February of 310. Up-down-up-down-up-down for weeks, hovering around 315.
Believe me: This is pure power, folks...
Realtors you will deal with will always give you a rosy picture of the property you have an eye on. Despite the fact that he or she would want to make a sale, he or she also has the most information. Thus it will pay to know more than what he or she is telling you about the property you have in mind.
I'd like to share a quote from the acknowledgements of my second 13th Reality book, which was written way before I'd ever heard of a movie called INCEPTION and before THE DARK KNIGHT came out.
First of all, thank you all for the birthday wishes, and secondly, thank you to all who tweeted with concern about my lack of posting recently. It's that second point brings me to the purpose of this post.
March 6, 1935 (Wednesday): After lunch I visited Thornber’s hatchery. In that place I met a woman trainee for sexing chickens. She was 18 years old and very cute especially her mouth and her eyes. She is too beautiful and cute for words. Her name is Miss West. But her ability was not high and out of the question so I checked again her judgement. As a result she had made many mistakes!
There's only a few more things to do and I can call this room a wrap! I'm not sure I'm leaving the ceiling blue, but it'll stay for now and a painting may or may not get done at some point. Regardless a rustic gold frame is being made for the boys current art as soon as I can get to it.
Actual photos of goofy Siamese-twin AR-15 setup are out. Sure to be included as an option in the next Call of Duty upgrade and the talk of every gun shop commando BECAUSE ISRAELI!
My etsy shop is closed this week because I'll be out of town! I'll reopen next Wednesday, May 23rd with lots of new goodies! Thank you to everyone who supported my sale! :)
It’s funny what unemployment will do to you. You have to reevaluate all your priorities and plans down to the last unpleasant detail. You have to consider what you need to buy versus what you want, and other such hackneyed concepts. Going out with my friends has to take the back seat to paying my rent and cell phone bill. There’s a lot of sacrifice involved, along with a lot of soul searching. You find out who your true friends are, and who is around for the fair weather. If you can take the time to navigate through it, I think these are the times when your true self grows,
PAXMAN: Psty pasty pasty. Ambient temperature? Pasty pasty pasty microwave oven pasty pasty leave the door pasty pasty pasty?
Continued from the previous post here: “Tea reminds me of the days of running hashish through the mountains of Tibet. No, just kidding, never did that, but my love of tea started with a tea pot I bought for my best friend Donna, so bear with me while we take a trip to find the best tea in the world.”
Organ Magic
I can't sit still lately. My mind is going a hundred miles an hour, dreaming up new ideas, trying to remember old ideas, jumping from one project to the next and feeling frustrated that I never feel "finished". I've been keeping a journal full of thoughts and ramblings, filling it with ideas that come to me in the middle of the night, or while washing dishes. If I don't write the ideas down, they will be gone momentarily, making room for the next lightbulb going off in my head!
So, I gave my kids a can of Pringles and said " Eat up kids, Mama's got to make a craft and try not to slobber on the can please."
Walters said it was imperative the SASSA database was cross-checked on a regular basis against both the PERSAL system, which is used for human resource transactions and the payment of salaries in the public service, and the population register of the Department of Home Affairs, which should indicate whether or not a specific individual is deceased.
291 - Chet Lemon
401(k) and 403(b) Deferrals: The amount an individual can contribute increased from $16,500 to $17,000. Those who are at least age 50 in 2012 can still contribute an additional (catch- up) $5,500, for a $22,500 maximum deferral.
Can anyone out there tell me the benefit of our AMAZINGLY complicated measuring system? Anyone? Bueller? (crickets chirp.... random patch of tumbleweed rolls in front of me.) Didn't think so. I don't know why the united states hasn't jumped on the metric system bandwagon yet, but it's about gdamn time in my opinion.
When we acknowledge our sin and confess, He forgives and protects. He is our hiding place; our new shelter. We have been scraped clean. Our foundation is new and nothing, nothing will rock the Foundation of the Lord. Welcome to your new Home.
Malcolm had been rooting through one of the better dumpsters in town, the one behind that swanky French restaurant “Chea Ronnie’s” onFifth Street, one night, when he had smelled Angelo’s approach.
05-23 Tokyo, Japan – Zepp
Turned the door handle.
I: That actually was sort of going to be my next comment. It seems like the IRM--not iconoclastic because obviously you know, there’s still the love of Krishna and Prabhupada--but you’re really trying to affect a positive change you know an established system. Would you say that’s reasonable?
I bought one of these big pretzels for Ash Wednesday and one for the following Friday. Not only are they tasty, but they also provide just the right amount of energy needed for those who wish to cut back and fast during Lent. I can highly recommend them!
1/2# Brussels Sprouts, finely shredded
Do you want to be blessed of God? Trust in the Lord Jesus Christ, His death burial and resurrection as the means for complete salvation and eternal life. You will not find that anywhere but in the writings and teachings of the apostle Paul. Obedience to Paul’s Gospel is the only way to have eternal salvation and the blessings of God upon your life.
Have a lovely weekend. If soggy. Again.
With the end of each season a window of opportunity closes in the pursuit of these objectives. Fortunately for most athletes, the window reopens with the start of the next season. I say fortunately for most athletes because there are a couple of situations that change one’s fortune. One situation is for the athlete that is aging – because in the end it is hard to outrun father time. The other is in the case of the Olympics, which like leap years, only come around once every four years – and there are only so many four year cycles in the life of an athlete.
Two essays not in the book that should be: the above-mentioned review of Wallace’s posthumous The Pale King, and a piece about Disney World, “You Blow My Mind. Hey Mickey!” I don’t want to confuse the issue by stressing either of these too much, but the first is really one of the most perceptive and intelligent essays about DFW on earth.
Place of Birth: Jamshedpur, Jharkhand
I should have trusted my instincts and skipped the commentary on Tea Obreht’s recent Orange Prize win in Book Site That Must Not Be Named. (Here's a link to a tweet to the piece. I can't bring myself to add to their pagerank by linking directly). I knew better than to expect cogent, insightful thinking about one of the more interesting literary prizes around. And still I clicked through.
Peter Fulton (10 innings – av 26. 1st class 106 innings av 45)
(Besides, I need to save that refrain for my non-tango waltzes, at the local country dances. That reminds me, I need to ask a fellow student whether she can teach me how to waltz; I still want to do that.)
International — A new movie has dealt yet another severe blow to the credibility of US based Monsanto, one of the biggest chemical companies in the world and the provider of the seed technology for 90 percent of the world’s genetically engineered (GE) crops.
Richard Taylor / from Eyelight / 100
spending priorities of the
The new royalty comprised of exotic genetic pedigrees including fake Native Americans like Warren has largely been achieved by another pillar used by royalty for centuries, namely, an appointed bureaucracy characterized by nepotism and corruption, an organization which has a vested interest in maintaining the privileges of a royal few at the expense of many.
I would like to say that I accomplished my goal of being able to park in my garage, but only partially. I definitely have room to fit my car, which makes me happy. Unfortunately, my house didn't come with a garage door opener remote for a car. So it looks like I'll be making a phone call to the garage door company or a making trip to a store where I can buy a universal remote, if that's even possible. Will post pictures soon.
7. That I execute this affidavit to attest to the truth of the foregoing.
"Antique Doorknob,
I need to motor through the week regardless of how gross I look and the pain.
And the word which you have heard, &c. Sermonem (Vulg.) ought to be sermo, and the verb in the original is in the present (ακουετε). The sense, therefore, is: the words which you are wont to hear from Me are not Mine alone, but the Father’s also who sent Me. Is not mine, but the Father’s who sent me. This form of expression, which seems to declare that the words are in no way Christ’s, is a Hebraism, and means that they are not His alone. See above on 7:16. Of course the authority of Christ’s words was equal in every way to that of the Father’s, but since the Apostles did not yet fully realize His Divinity with all that it implied, He invokes the Father’s authority as having more weight with them.
A case that went all the way to the Supreme Court forced the bar to break with it's most famous tradition and allow women to drink their in 1970. And by the '90s, they introduced their first female bartender, a daughter of the current owner, much to the chagrin of some traditionalists. If you get their early enough in the day and grab a table with your friends by the pot belly stove, it's a memorable experience of drinking ale served two mugs at a time and eating their signature dish of crackers, cheese and raw onions.
IP: Segregated cycleway is the way to go. How? Do you take away a lane for the cyclist? Don’t put motorist against cyclist. In the medieval city, it’s difficult to find a solution.
It's been raining for, like three days straight, and this morning i woke up with a sore throat.
5. Serve hot with Olive oil, and chopped basil on top of soup.
And since mommy sucks, and didn't do a 6 or 7 month post or pictures for buddy, here is the abbreviated version. He's been super sick since we returned from Birmingham (ear infection, HORRIBLE cough and cold), and I know he weighs almost 20 pounds. He weighed 19.8 last week. Dude is huge. He is in 9 month clothes and a size 3, sometimes 4 diaper. He is sleeping unswaddled and without a positioner. He wakes up more often (:like 1-2 times per night) and a little bit earlier, but I guess he's just getting used to his sleeping freedom.
After it ceased to be used as a church, the building was largely destroyed by fire in 1979, it was later restored to became an auction room.
“Politicians should stop promoting ethnocentrism with disregard to invading Ghana’s fledgling democracy’, he noted, adding that it was also necessary for them to exhibit self discipline in their activities at the right time and place.
An unalterable attribution statement will appear below the pin’s description along with a permanent link to the content, its creator, and where the content is hosted. Furthermore, the attribution will appear even if a photo is pinned from a third-party site where a Flickr image has been embedded.
Authentic Intuition
12. The Smiles and Frowns - Mechanical Songs (5:06)
I ended up with the far left. Far right was similar to what I’d previously done, and I probably had the middle one inadvertently at one point or another. I mean, there’s only so much I can do with my hair. I like the way this one looks, so I might keep it for a while.
God’s law was given so that all people could see how sinful they were. But as people sinned more and more, God’s wonderful grace became more abundant. So just as sin ruled over all people and brought them to death, now God’s wonderful grace rules instead, giving us right standing with God and resulting in eternal life through Jesus Christ our Lord.
Flower
They had even pulled down the national flag. Many felt it was a sign of shame and a wish not to be identified as the butt of the criticisms from outside.
Mrs Jones was furious. An eccentric at the best of times, she didn't quite know what to say. While she'd be a pushover, my parents would be the exact opposite. I'd said nothing when we got home, but I knew if was only a matter of time. So when dad decided to go and get some chocolate, I jumped at the chance to go with him, just to avoid the knock on the door that I knew was inevitable. But it was hardly the crime of the century.
won and who lost?
I bought an ax off ebay and it turned into a project. Its a 3 1/2 pound "Our Own Hardware" single bit and the seller said the handle was in good shape. Well, good for firewood maybe. It was cracked length wise and eaten badly at the haft point and loose as a goose. I wouldn't swing this ax one time with a crappy handle like that! So, off to the hard ware store and a brand new hickory handle. Here are some "before" pics of the old handle as it arrived. Not very safe looking.......
‘Secretary Rice, seeing as it was made painfully clear that was NOT historical information, what led to you believe it was?’
We prepared a Mexican Banquet - my favourite food.
(Watch for more American Women's Children's Illustrations
And I just swigged four teaspoonsful of liquid Benadryl, so, night night, world. Night night, you stupid, stinky, germ-and-allergen-filled world.
“I understand, sweetie. But remember yesterday when you wanted to do nothing but lay on the beach from dawn until dusk? How you said that if we did what you wanted to do yesterday, that we could do what I wanted to do today?”
Hopes? Dreams? Expectations?
The games bring a fantastic opportunity for the Brasov region to market itself.
I loved this book! A Matter of Class was a short novel from Balogh so it was quick to read but you wanted more. There was a definite finish to the novel that left you smiling and all the characters happy.
Back on track with some alcohol to fry any good decision making skills, we came across what can only be described as a haven for IT geeks. An entire arcade full of shops selling PC parts, gadgets and whatever-you-call-that-thing. But that’s where we found the shiny beacon of picture takering. The exact same model as Sonya’s at the bargain price of $AUS450! Success!
Patient: "My father buys them for me."
Their owner cursed us
Shoprite's commitment to support local industries (manufacturers and farmers) in the country has been well received by the Federal Government who has made every effort to guide and support our investment in Nigeria.
I know a few of the books in the previous lists have also scored the triple-glory, but I’m only a quarter of the way through the sci-fi/fantasy awards. I know Neil won’t hold this ground uncontested for long.
How many signs do we need that things aren’t right? With reports for the second year in a row of a reduction in the number of candidates standing for the Lib Dems as local councillors we have another piece of information which is perhaps more worrying than the reduction in poll ratings. So perhaps we need to consider this very carefully and what we need to do to start to reverse this trend.
I don't answer. I just smile. Still not looking at him.
On a related subject, it’s long been my view that there is a gap in the mainstream beer market for a premium lager of around 5.5-6.0% ABV. However, for the same reasons, no major brewer would touch this with a bargepole for fear of denting their image of social responsibility. To some extent the Polish imports like Tyskie and Zywiec fill this niche, but there’s nothing brewed in this country. In a sense, when it was 5.2%, that little extra kick was a major selling point for Stella. A couple of years ago, the much-trailed launch of the 5.5% Stella Black was pulled, and the name was later used for a weaker “premium” brand extension which now seems to have died the death.
Angela used:
While I’m not a huge fan of eggs by themselves, I’m an even smaller fan of the clean-up afterwards. I’ve discovered that the clean-up of eggs can be quite daunting and not very fun to clean up.
We went out yesterday and Gordon, my sweet amazing husband, bought it as a present for me. I am soo happy, although I got a little concerned and felt somewhat guilty because of the price he paid for it.
He also needs to define terms like 'assisted dying' and 'terminally ill' precisely so that we can understand what he is actually talking about.
I really hope that these changes help. Other than being a few years older, the exercise is the only thing I could identify as something different from when I got pregnant with both boys - first try on IUI. I know age is a definite factor in egg quality, but I'm hoping that is not the issue at hand.
Over the course of the last year, the Bartolomeo family had been building the 3600 square foot replacement to its former Palisades Park store — which now resides on Dean Street in Englewood. As many of you are aware, Englewood is home to Jerry’s Gourmet, another large Italian grocery store. I had been wondering what Carlo Bartolomeo was going to do to differentiate himself from the incumbent Italian mega-grocery, and now I know what it is — prepared foods.
I am always
were strong.
Robert Zemeckis (Who Framed Roger Rabbit)
Last Ascent To The Red Cross is currently also on display, along with Touch, at the Pixels At An Exhibition Show in Kansas. Touch was originally a screenshot of an erotic film clip playing on my Macbook.
Its big too!! OMG, I hate snakes. Ive been watching for them because its been so warm out. I decide its time to go home. We are walking the outside of the island and will cut through this shallow area to go back into the park. There is a guy standing in ankle deep water fishing. I dont know where he came from. I should have put Guiness on leash but I really didnt think it would be a problem. Ugh, Guiness went crazy. Barking, going right up to the guy. I could tell the guy was scared. Then I get Guiness and Java decided to bark at the guy too. Great. The poor guy being scared senless by this crazy ladys dogs. I felt terrible about this. I get across the river and decided to walk the field back so we dont run into any bikes. Here come this older man and again Guiness and then Java go crazy. WTH??? I just want to get to my car without any more problems. I feel like Im wrecking other peoples time at the park. No one wants to go to the park and have their nice quiet walk interrupted by maniac dogs.
I like calling myself Urbano, and then assign more commitment to my artistic work.
* High strength metal joint fittings
Crazy for Christmas (Not for Children) ... LMN ... 8 AM
Floral de Saint Germain were received and attuned by Neide Margonari, plastic artist, who ended up choosing your spiritual path by choosing to dedicate himself exclusively to floral.
And this is what you see when you pull out the insert. Nothing too fancy, just some lightly stamped animals. I know, I know, I am getting to what is actually cool about this card!
As I walked out of the cinema I felt alive and let out a laugh. 13 Assassins is truly a brilliant film and I’m watching it for a second time today!
I thought 'stuff it' and hit the Target Baby Sale.
C. Finally the student may select one of three options: to get further exposure on E-marketing from an international partner institute, to be attached to an E-commerce company or be mentored while setting up an Eventure of their own.
my fifteen-year old son, Jack, said,
After the concert, we went to Harvester for dinner. Now the first time we went there, we never got to eat as after 45 mins of waiting, we walked out. Tonight, hubby decided to give it another go and so we did, at Starcity. What a major disappointment! Food was sub-standard and not tasty at all. Hub and I didn't enjoy our steak at all, the sauces were tasteless and the wee one's child meal looked bland and awful. Not surprising he didn't eat a lot of it. The older one's meal of fish and chips was ok. The verdict: NEVER go back again. I should have insisted on Frankie and Benny... they have much better food there!
And hope that you find the missing piece,
*I don't recommend consuming raw eggs. You're on your own with that--well you'll be doing it with along with me, but not because I told you to!
So what “knowing spirits agreed and wanted to participate in” is your coming out of your predisposed contract and rewriting it! The goal of the Human Being on Earth is to void the karmic past, which represents the old energy of Earth, and to activate of interdimensional DNA to begin the process of mastery. This is celebrated by all the Universe and refreshes the contract of life itself. The masters on Earth did this, and so can you.
Rule#5: Really do tag 11 others, don't go all ''if you want to take this tag''
In letters received by the mayor and fire chief on April 16, the Freedom From Religion Foundation asked the City of Woonsocket, R.I. to relocate the memorial to private property and for the Fire Department to remove the prayer and graphic from its Web site.
Level 4: Mastery: +57%, Weapon ATT: +4, Minimum Critical Damage: +2%.
Banquet Chairs
The big winners of the gold bull market will ultimately be the gold mining stocks. Look at this way. If a gold company’s cost to produce one ounce of gold is $900, at a price of $1,800, they are making a 100% profit. But, at price of $3,000, they are making a profit of 233%—and the stock market will reward the stock by multiples of 233%.
I actually enjoyed it, and believe me, I didn’t expect to. After all, it’s Julia Roberts as the Evil Queen, and I didn’t think she’d be able to pull it off. The movie gave her a very different role for the Queen – she runs around in bright colors, threatens and swears like a sailor, and uses magic in unconventional ways – even for her. Despite the fact that the movie itself is named after the magic mirror, instead of having some genie-type male worshipper stuck in her magic glass, there in the magicked hut out in the middle of nowhere, her magic glass holds only a reflection of herself, absent the gems and makeup and all, warning against all and cautioning temperance and the high cost of magic used. Which was a bold move, but I think it worked out in the end.
I’ve been pretty quiet lately. Mainly because there’s not been a lot happening to report on. Let’s see if I can catch you up a little.
…I wanted McFloat! but the coke doesn’t have carbon?!…
Usually, I see other family members there, cousins that I only see every once in awhile.....but today we had monsoons, absolute pour downs of rain. But even that was quite beautiful, the grey skies, the rain, and the brilliant flowers decorating the graves. As I walked from grave to grave,
happy weekending! I am going to have a WONDERFUL weekend. how bout you?
-small tempeh pieces, peppers, onions
In a customary gesture of over-the-top generousity, Keely had literally created a doll for each of us, according to our True Colors color-of-choice. There was a doll for each of us. Mine has a halo of white maribou feathers surrounding the face, and the body of the doll is covered in a white-on-white damask fabric, with an off-white canvas printed tape, and a tiny white-washed wooden dollhouse fence.
who will be the one?
3. That great lovers-in-the-boat song
* Dear Bloggerdotcom, why do you have to be such a turd site? I've been trying to upload pictures for like EVER and now you're not letting me upload any more at all. What gives? Do you need a lap dance? Yours, K
2 – A convicted sex-offender goes to prison. While there he takes a course in how to better manage his drives, although the officers on the wing constantly deride the course and the whole prison works against the course teachings. He is bullied, barred from communicating with his family and forced to share a cell with someone who “f*ing hates nonces.” It is every man for himself and he learns how to break the rules and manipulate the officers to survive. He is released to a hostel in a city he has never been to before, still barred from being with his family and has no way of securing work because he is barred by his licence from almost every conceivable opportunity.
And now, it's time for a short excerpt!
How do you stand up for what is right and hype people up with fear factor politics at the same time?
Anyone know any good ones of pre- revolutionary Paris? I need all the help I can get,
Buried as he is deep in Zeffirelli's staggering and underappreciated by film students Jesus of Nazareth (1977), it might be understandable how I couldn't google any decent (non-Xian) appreciation of Michael York's ferocious John the Baptist anywhere on the web. Their loss, dumb film students! Don't let the Christians fool you! Zeffirelli's film is way better than Last Temptation of Christ.
Everyone is safe. The first night after the quake, the train service was disrupted so some people had to sleep in their offices because they could not get home. However, things are slowly returning back to normal, and so far the e-mails have been positive.
no matter what our current president might believe,
My essence moves beyond this sphere
This is another Madhur Jaffrey recipe, and I followed it as precisely as I could. It turned out great! Alice and Baby had dinner with us and they loved it too.
So yesterday I was talking about how easy it is to go off on a tangent and lose your focus, and then last night I was talking to someone about my Gumshoe whining and he said “you gotta read Ashen Stars” and I’m like “dude, I know it” and he’s like “here it is” and bam, I’m off focus, reading away on something I can easily read in five years from now.
And boy, am I glad I did. Shingeki no Kyojin has now become the shounen manga I swear by, the shounen manga I console myself with when I’m annoyed with Bleach and when I’ve all but given up with Naruto. But more than that, it’s the manga I point to as the epitome of Japanese storytelling…apart from Kare Kano. Hehe.
Longing itself brings the cure.
My middle-grades historical fiction manuscript, A Pickpocket's Tale, won the Sydney Taylor Manuscript contest, which is open only to unpublished writers and is free to enter. There's a nice prize, but it doesn't include publication.
Yes America is having some hard times, but it’s not that bad is it? In New York where the crime rates are much higher than in Florida, this proposal is not on the table, even though the residents needs some form of protection. It is not legal for a resident of New York to own a gun, however the criminals have them. How fair is that? A business owner cannot protect himself, and a married couple strolling in the part cannot protect themselves and run the risk of getting shot by some unruly thug. Why does the South have to be so notorious for their gun control issues?
With that baked chicken, we know our parts quite well by now. He prefers breast meat and thighs. Yeah, yeah…never mind. I like the oysters found on the back, but in the car it’s simpler to pull off a drumstick for myself and strips of white meat for Ned. Later, when we’ve gotten home and put the groceries away, dinner is some kind of salad and further pieces of that poor bird we ravaged in the car.
The only other nugget I can offer is Kultura featured Polish punk mainstay Piotr Żyżelewicz who sadly passed away a couple of months back. If you’re not familiar with the name Żyżelewicz, he moonlighted with new-wavers Kryzyks and Voo Voo, supplied the ferocious backbeat for hardcore band Muskwa and even teamed up with Brummy dub poet Benjamin Zephaniah on one occasion.
Cliches are semi-heavy in Hyouka. We have a male lead character (Hotaro), who isn’t particularly interesting himself, but serves as someone through which we can view the more exciting characters – primarily, the upbeat female lead character (Eru). This setup is pretty common, and immediately, I can name Haruhi Suzumiya and OreImo as two animes that implement this trope. We also have the extrovert-introvert best friends, which is not impossible to occur outside the anime world, but considering that Satoshi is outgoing enough to make up for Hotaro ten times over, it’s an anime miracle he doesn’t ditch Hotaro for a larger ring of friends. Plus, there’s also the thing about characters meeting each other through a club.
And once he got out of jail, he would not have to go back to robbing banks. I bet he would be invited to appear in movies, speak to collections of bishops at Kanuga retreats, be in photo shoots, and he might get to stay at a certain unnamed mansion, all in order that he live into his authentic self.
Never setting me free.
Cardiovascular Benefits
After Nottingham I had a brief few days in London visiting family. I stopped consuming a ridiculous amount of fat in the form of British breakfasts, and actually walked around for a while. Visited the meat market and St. Bartholomew's church.
Our lovely teamie Mel has chosen the theme, in honour of her new puppy, Harley - who is wreaking havoc at puppy training classes!! :-)
Rhinestone River – Limes
I'll admit for much of my life I have been a food skeptic. If I never tried it, I was pretty sure I wouldn't like it. I could see food that looked good in a photo, but if it didn't smell right on the plate, I wouldn't eat it. I had definite ideas about how something would taste and most of the time I believed it would taste bad.
to change,
The explanation of Jewish radicalism one is treated to — and I am still staying with “Madison” — is that “Jews emerged from the ghetto with hostility toward the culture around them” and “Jewish hostility toward the culture of non-Jews has been a constant threat throughout Jewish history.” Has this hostility arisen by immaculate conception?
Only 800m from the kids' school.
2~4 = 1 Coin
- The costs are far greater than the Administration claim — heading as high as $2.134 trillion with millions Americans dependent on government for their health care.
hooked on Wambaugh’s fresh approach to writing and decided at that moment I wanted to be a writer when I grew up and got tired of police work. First, I had to go out and experience excitement, and then I had to learn to write well enough for people to want to read about it. So, I worked dangerous and exciting assignments during my career, and then as I rose in the ranks, I went back to college and graduated cum laude from the University of Washington Bothell. The only problem is that I never got tired of police work. I’m still here after all
Our Pastor, Marc Lawson, has dedicated all 5 of our kids. Here is everyone praying a blessing over Grant. He was so happy as always. We gave him the nickname "Smiley" as a baby because he was so joyful all of the time.
Publishing News
I am not sure if you know this, but I completely love love love Alice in Wonderland. Everything about it!
If the wind blows me south
We took the car he rented on the ferry with us over to A l g i e r s P o i n t. We got out of the car and walked over to the deck to look at the city skyline.
I interrupt this regularly scheduled writing blog to express an opinion.
Then, the group of non-aligned nations – 77 nations – pooled their assets… all their wealth, their gold and other valuables… and set up some global collateral accounts.
We started inquiring with the selling agent to get more information about this home and find out what the story behind it is. It is listed as 2575 square feet and $385,000 which is a smidge out of our price range.
I Made These Ribbon & Lace Roses While Surfing You Tube Last Night Looking for Altered Paper Clips For Kim's Paper Digital Art & Images Group Challenge.
Preheat oven to 500˚F/ 250˚C (if using a pizza stone, place in oven to pre heat as well)
I mixed the sour cream dressing onto the onions and cucumber and put it into the refrigerator to chill. Another aside: I think that the sour cream cucumbers were ultimately the most successful element of #19.
I am taking the LSAT in December, so now I will be studying like crazy for the next five months. These logic games will be the death of me I can already tell. This whole thing just goes to show, as much as I hate to admit it, you should listen to your parents. They have been telling me ever since I can remember that I was going to grow up to be either a lawyer or a diplomat. However, life is about making your own choices, coming to your own decision and finding your own path. The decision wouldn’t be the same without me discovering it for myself, but let the record show that they were right.
That’s it. MacGyver Season three… GO!
Sometimes I say something that displeases my younger daughter, along the lines of "Bedtime. Tidy." or "Your magic rectangle half an hour is up." or "Stop being an irriational, paranoid, self-centered replica of your father." And she will often reply, more, I suspect, in hope than expectation, "Are you being sarcastic?". Take from this what you will.
She said: 'Our grandmother looks like she has been beaten up - her injuries are horrific. 'The whole family has been left mortified by what happened.
An Englishwoman in Cannes, Jackie (pictured above) has had an impressive career spanning the worlds of real estate, finance, antiques, telecom and insurance. Jackie and her husband Burt, a New Yorker, made the move down from London in 2000 and Jackie set up shop the following year. Through her company French Riviera Property Search, she offers comprehensive, tailor-made services to help would-be renters and buyers find the perfect place. She works up and down the Cote d’Azur, from Frejus to Menton, specializing in Antibes, Juan les Pins, Cannes, La Napoule and the hills behind them, such as Mougins, Valbonne, Plascasier, Opio and Biot.
The main premise of neural diagonal thinking is to combine simultaneously and simulspaciously both lateral and hierarchical thinking through an understanding of both neuroanatomy and neurochemistry. Thus, we use the typology of nodes, architectures of directed graphs, causal links and chemical pathways as the building blocks for this direction into creativity magnification.
Seen: at home, 5/1/12
Practice the golfing more, would you? You’re THISCLOSE to being a phenomenal golfer at the high school level – and you play in college – but in this area you accept a version of mediocrity that with just a TAD more effort you would grow beyond. Either way, relish the time you’re spending with the girls on the golf team. These are your best girlfriends 15 years from now and though you will scatter across the globe, you will come back to these girls – women – time after time. You’ll have Destination Girls’ Weekends, babies and hangovers with these same girls. Commit the time you have with them now to memory so you can hold this information over their head years from now.
- Strategies to squeeze dissenting scientists out of the peer review process
1 lair
My new brand is about just being me – Lisa Lintern, the melodramatic me.
5 tablespoons ground black pepper
The Master’s Lodge, in the rubble of which the portrait was found, was later, but had housed earlier portraits. It’s unknown exactly how the painting came to be in the wreckage. Accounts suggest, variously, that it had been known previously, but had not been thought important – or that it had been hidden in a cupboard and forgotten. (There is precedence for such forgetfulness. Ingestre Hall in Staffordshire, now displays an immensely valuable tapestry, which was found stuffed at the back of a small ‘coal-hole’. In Durham Castle, a ‘junk-room’, once cleared, was found to be a forgotten, untouched gem of an early Norman chapel.)
A1: Uh-huh. Our new kitty died.
They pulled to a halt at a set of traffic lights and her hand went straight for the door. She shoved it open and the man grabbed her, pulling her back against him. The door slammed shut without her touching it and the locks clunked into place. She elbowed the man in the ribs, struggled out of his grip and lunged for the door again, frantically tugging on the handle. It wouldn’t open. Her eyes darted over the moulded leather of the door. No way of unlocking it. The Venator would stop her before she could find the button on the dashboard that would unlock the doors. She spat out a curse. Never mind. If she couldn’t escape, she could at least taste her blood.
The ladies of the early 1960s have a whole assortment of styles to choose from. They can choose to be the Suburban housewife, the aspiring working girl (and first hints of feminism) or the Pin Up. When researching your outfit, make sure to focus on early 1960s. We would even stray into late 1950s before attempting late 1960s which was a whole different mood. Unless you are appearing as the 1960s Pin Up girl, err on the side of sexually repressed.
MH, if by any chance you are reading this, thank you for sharing this wonderful recipe!
the best YA novels are often among the best novels, period.
Last week I made a stop at one of my favorite stores, Anthropologie, where I spied these turquoise beauties. They have a stamped pattern and a crazed, crackly finish and, let's just say, they called out my name. Can't you just see yourself sipping a tasty drink from one of these? Me too...along with something delicious to nibble on, of course.
Victor Dartnall (born November 2, 1948) is based on Exmoor at Higher Shutscombe Farm, Brayford, near Barnstaple in North Devon. He has a racing family background; his father Desmond was a professional jockey and later a trainer. After a successful stint as an amateur rider, Dartnall started his training career with point-to-pointers and handled two British champions before taking out a full licence in 1998. He currently has a string of some 30 horses and has maintained a high strike-rate, particularly with staying chasers. As well as Giles Cross, there are or have been Exmoor Ranger, a Grade 3 winner at Ascot earlier in the season and third in the Kim Muir Chase at the 2012 Cheltenham Festival, progressive Roudoudou Ville, a close third on a Cheltenham Grade 3 chase in December, and Russian Trigger, winner of the Midlands Grand National three years ago. The stable also houses the promising Ambion Wood, winner of Sandown’s NH Hurdle Final in March.
JoyGrenade and CeNsoriNg you two are complete brainwashed drones, devoid of any emotions. You obviously didn't read this article...
And when I finally got to my house, they had piled everything I owned in the living room and kitchen. I couldn't even get into those rooms, they were packed helter skelter from floor to ceiling and from front to back. I had to move a bunch of stuff just to make room to get our fridge and stove moved in. When I tried to do laundry, the washer hose sprayed water everywhere. It took months to get that fixed and then after a week of doing massive amounts laundry I realized that the washer was leaking and there was water under everything in my laundry room. I STILL don't have that fixed yet!!!! Before we left St. John's to come here to Loch Leven, we had arranged with the cable and internet company to have everything set up within two days of our getting here. Well, they kept changing our appointment and after a month, they finally turned up. When they got here, they pulled into the driveway, went up the pole, and then climbed down and drove away. As I saw them driving away, I called them to find out what was going on. It turns out that NO Cable and high speed internet company services our area and they didn't tell us that before we were waiting for a month to get hooked up!!! We then had to start at the beginning to find out our options. So we are now the proud users of a satellite dish and the reluctant residents dial-up internet hell.
We went for coffee, did heaps of wee chores and just bumbled around kid/husband free for the day. It was bliss.
Btw, I'm looking for two more residents to fill our 6-bed facility. If you or someone you know (18 or over) need(s) help with one or more ADLs and enjoy(s) authentic Cuban cuisine, the chatter of Spanish-speaking parrots and the warmth and beauty of South Florida, please let me know in Comments.
Our verse tells us, “The God of our fathers hath chosen thee, that thou shouldest know his will.”
I believe a good story starts with great characters and having the ability to allow the reader feel as if they know them. Once I created those characters for Sullivan’s Secret, I placed them into a storyline filled with intrigue and mystery. I tried to keep the plot moving at a steady pace so as not to lose the reader. It may be a story of fiction, but you also need to remember to make it somewhat believable. I think Dr. Bartek and the SIPS team does just that.
Kickest thou the can
In honor of that, this is going to be part 1 in an occasional series of posts I'm going to make on this blog. This'll be where I compare an early set of lyrics to a later set of lyrics for one Joy Division song. Sometimes I may compare multiple sets of lyrics of just one song to each other. When you couple in a lot of the live variations to certain songs, you can get all sorts of results. My first choices are...the studio versions to Atrocity Exhibition.
Not in a creepy-stalker way, of course. It’s just that we take the “public” part of “public service” pretty seriously. Libraries are built to serve communities, and communities are made up of people. Last time we checked, you’re a person; ergo, we think about you. A lot. Just to make sure we’re on track with what you really want and need from a library.
I want a book – and it's not just the content I am talking about here, though of course that is somewhat crucial. It's the 'physical object', the actual 'bookiness' of the book that I am referring to – the smooth paper or card, the black words on a white page, the gradations of colour and tone in different styles of artwork, the folds, the flaps, the die-cuts, the matt laminate (a personal favourite) ... I’m sure you get the point.
Well, I can tell you what NLA is doing. And because I believe in involving greater minds than my own, I used the best resource of all--our own clients. Working in partnership with them, we developed NLA's Digital Liaison Platform. My lawyer was also a big help but he simply formulated the agreement language once we had nailed down the model.
Lab tests for viruses in marine mammals usually take ten days. The dolphin die-offs began last November-early December.
And the writing. I chafe against my own inactivity. As great as it was to have R. here, I miss sitting with the page. With a new job, I’ll miss having hours a day to attend to it. But, as Glorious said the other night, I wrote The Spiritkeeper with a full-time job…I’ll do the same with finishing Everything—and with the next one, too.
“We are fortunate in that we are truly living in a golden period of planetary transits and it is one of which I hope astronomers can take full advantage,” Pasachoff says.
So for now, I take this grief and thru prayer I ask the Lord to direct me and show me what He would have me learn from this. I ask that He make my heart sensitive to His voice, so that I can learn to be a sensitive voice when the time comes.
I pointed to my wife a couple of paces away. “Can you see that lady shaking her head with her hand over her eyes? That’s because she doesn’t understand what you are selling!”
distress inks - fired brick.black soot.forest moss,tumbled glass and broken china
pounds out her meat;
26 April 2012
In the world of negotiation/gamesmanship, a "lumpy good" is something over which people are unwilling/unable to compromise.
12 flour tortillas
Here’s what else is being released this week.
*Labor signs?: No, thank Goodness....but I do believe I have started having some Braxton Hicks over the last few days.
Honey’s childhood friend Peter Freckle is a bullfighter. She goes to see him after he sent her a letter and is horrified to see him stagger and then get goured twice by the bull. Peter is taken to a dressing room and Honey is not allowed to see him. Then word comes that he died. She tricks the impresario so she can get into the dressing room. The body’s gone.
Opening one eye, Malcolm looked at the dog that had saved his life.
"my dad made me jam, thanks dad"
Still, even if abusive drinkers do get a few rounds on the house, calorically speaking, it doesn’t add up to a knockout figure. Habitual excessive alcohol consumption has long been linked to an increased waistto-
It is such a great way to take in a wide range of experiences. When we paddle, the experience of place moves from the brain to the heart, making it a life-forming experience. – Kevin Redmond
The wind picked up just enough to tease me and blow the smell of seaweed and algae towards my nose.
Add several drops of vanilla extract to your gallon of paint to mask the head-aching paint fumes. It's that easy folks! Give it a whirl!
A capricious period
-construction paper scraps
–Publishers Weekly
A friend of mine who was also reading “1Q84” saw a lot of parallels between evangelical Christian “cultism” and that sort of sentiment explored in the book. Early last year, I was reading Murakami’s nonfiction “Underground” about the Tokyo sarin gas attacks made by Aum Shinrikyo cult, and while I did not finish this book, I found it very interesting that “1Q84” delves somewhat into a religious cult I think with some parallels to Aum. I think Murakami does bring up some interesting ideas.
Friends, that's it. Please don't think I only make time for other bloggers. I'm a big-time slacker and a cheap date, so if you're ever coming for a visit and want to blow off a few hours, do shoot me an email. We can even go fabric "shopping."
An orange color means almost no change, while a red color means the ratings dropped, and a green color means the ratings improved.
Budweiser is fit for a mates house party or at a club, fits with a guys image, little in terms of taste to offend or surprise the consumer and hard to spill so long as its kept in the bottle. Budvar is a little more reserved and almost an opposite in terms of setting. This would be more acceptable at a dinner table or in a nice pub with a few salty snacks to help it go down. This beer also has much more flavour, less carbonisation and is far more complimented when poured into a glass.
One constant on a visit to Perbacco, the modern Italian that opened late last year to much aclaim is the higgeldy-piggeldy way the loft-like space has been filled with differently styled dining areas. But where chance happens to place you in this maze might colour your experience of the evening. The cosy area underneath the low roof of the mezzanine where conversation is more hushed, lighting is low and mirrors reflect the convivial atmosphere will feel more special than if you are slapped up against a cumbersome pillar in the airier space between the bar and the kitchen with no respite from any raucous Birthday bunch who might be sitting at the nearby Chef's table and celebrating with increasing decibels.
“THE CURSE OF THE BLACK SPOT” – Series 6, Episode 3, Story 215 – Written by Stephen Thompson; Directed by Jeremy Webb – Stowaways! The Eleventh Doctor, Amy, and Rory end up on a becalmed pirated ship in 1699. These rough and tumble pirates freak out when anyone gets a paper cut because being injured means a spooky beautiful bluish-greenish-skinned woman is going to show up and turn you into dust. Except she’s not killing you, she’s transporting you to an alien ship where she can hold you in stasis until you get better. Maybe. Someday. Because She’s Not Really Super Good At The Healing Thing.
One of THE items on my list is The World of Muriel Brandolini, a book which I came across through a tweet by Barneys NY). I have been a long time admirer of Brandolini's work. What immediately attracted me were her Asian infused interiors, but always perfectly mixed with contemporary art and antiques. She is a true master when it comes to mixing different styles and fearless when it comes to using colour (although the cover of her book would like you to believe differently). I love the way her work has evolved over the years and now finally there is a beautiful book covering her fabulous projects!
"The amount of time that has passed is relatively insignificant, given what he's trying to do," Stone says.I kind of like the "Mikk-speak" bit, but repeating the phrase "the rocks haven't fallen" seems clumsy to me, and the "relatively insignificant" dialogue rather clunky. More importantly, this scene is supposed to be building tension as they wait to hear if Coop is all right, but it falls flat because Rusch has not explained why the guy doesn't have a radio or communicator to keep in contact with the group. Hell, he isn't going that far -- couldn't he just yell for help if he were trapped?
We 'sungkai' (break fast) with this and hot rice, some 'Sambal Asam' (mangoes from my tree) & 'Fried Salted Mustard with Eggs' yesterday.
Hot Tamale told me he was creeping up on us with his balloons in hand. I guess he thought it would be fun to sneak up on Teddy Bear and surprise her. Well, he certainly did that. She literally screamed like someone had pulled her head off. How does that much volume come out of something that little? She probably weighed all of 20 pounds. (She has always been a little thing with messy reddish hair.)
11. Destination Ecstacy
A second hurdle is the need for ideas. All creativity is the expression of ideas. But what if there are no ideas? Is the rumour of an idea, the whisper of possibility enough, or should the writer/artist/composer wait for something more concrete?
Preheat your oven to 350. Set the butter and chocolate in a double boiler over medium heat. Allow to melt completely. While you're waiting for it to melt, butter and cocoa powder dust a 9 inch springform pan and wrap with foil if you're concerned about it not being water tight.
Way above us the desert snow – white wind blow
Okay so here's the rules: please post the picture of my candy on your blog linking back to here! And well that's it. No need to be a follower. Of course I'd love it if you would be not a requirement. I will draw the winner on hubby's birthday - May 12th. Enter your name below and good luck!
These days, I very own some sort of Samsung Galaxy II having Android 2.3.3. I traded this kind of with an i phone 2G : did not consider I previously could, however i do. I think just like a traitor and also don’t believe Let me be able to receive over this sort of feeling to get a long, long time. I need to confess nevertheless, I love the actual Samsung Galaxy II due to the outstanding colour (have always loved Samsung phones just for this credit), it is remarkable touch screen rate, it’s actually thinness as well as lightness understanding that it can some sort of much better work simply by replicating iPhone’s ideas topped that has a variety of Android Applications which are totally free! (At this point, at this point I am aware Android is definitely offered in several other brand names associated with phones as well).
You’ve probably heard of “reason why” advertising—a phrase I believe comes from John E Kennedy, though I learned it from Drayton Bird. As human beings, we crave order. We want to know why something is the way it is, what caused something to happen. And we crave it particularly in our own lives.
So you want to buy an LCD TV, but you’re not quite sure what to look for before making an investment. It’s always to know as much as possible about the type of TV that you’re interested in before you make your selection. Here are a few tips to help you buy an LCD TV with confidence.
They are a group of people without a voice to speak for them, and who's own voices are only ever heard in auditorium designed to deride them. They appear as criminals on the peripheries of gritty cop shows, in documentaries about urban decay and social dependency, their words edited deliberately to make them seem more moronic and brutal even than they are, and on that other platform designed to present human failure as entertainment, the daytime TV Talk show.
THANK YOU!!!!!
This Heaven of Heaven
To recap, I decided to put Spoil of War up for free in late October. The plan was to get it free on Amazon and keep it free for only a few days. Since any good campaign plan includes a list of expected results, I hoped to 1) garner a few more credible reviews for the book and 2) capitalize on the book's better visibility once it came off free to spur sales before the holidays so that post-Christmas it would be in a favorable position to be discovered by lots of happy readers with new Kindles and nooks.
Here's a look at the classes I'll be teaching
In the meantime i hope that your week is going well, and i will post again very soon
The worst part, though is what they really don't tell you in those books about what you're supposed to be expecting during this glorious time is that a lot of this shit never goes away. Yes, that's right, that pregnancy induced Bells Palsy you acquired 10 years ago? That shit'll last a lifetime, it will.
Second bus turns up - Jersey boys seem to think it's funny that they've never seen cows before. Seems pretty lame to me. Stalker Girl manages to pull it together on her own (despite Stalker Boy's insistence that she's horrible at math because she's an English major). Then The Soc' Em Twin and Meathead decide to team up to beat the already down-trodden clown with no math skills. Seems unnecessary to me as they've hardly shown themselves to be the most competitive. Plus it makes me listen to another Tears of a Clown line.
Well, not to worry! American Big Agra has something new for your body to tinker with. And it has a really cool name too!
1 riot
Earlier today I was driving back home after dropping Kira off at a movie theater clear across town. (Why across town, when there are a million movie theaters that were closer? Because this one was more convenient for her friend. Kira has now been instructed that any future friends she makes have to live within a five mile radius of our house. When she meets someone, before even striking up a conversation she has to ask for their zip code and if it's too far she has to say, "I'm sorry. You're nice and all, but my mother almost had an aneurysm the last time she had to drive me across town for a movie so just move along.")
the one who lost his gravity
In the bowl of your electric mixer (or with a hand mixer), beat the butter and remaining sugar until light and fluffy (approximately 3 minutes). Beat in the vanilla extract, egg yolks, and lemon zest. Beat in the ground nuts. Add the flour mixture beating just until incorporated. Divide the dough in half and shape into two rectangles about 1/2 inch (1.5 cm) thick. Wrap the two rectangles of dough in plastic wrap and refrigerate until firm (at least one hour and up to several days).
SOUTH AUSTIN BREWING Belgian Style Golden Ale
It's the first day of college for the Freshmen. Excitement, trepidation. Car doors slamming. Distressed mother's crying and embracing their first years as if it was their first year at primary school.
That makes it quite fine. If it were finer than that it would be difficult to keep intact.
Taiwanese style, but theirs would be covered with a brown sauce.
16. You can take senior trips, and some of them are very cool.
150 gram sugar
Let me offer a counter-analogy to Glen Duncan's porn star comparison. Glen Duncan fancies himself an intellectual, so we'll picture him as a college professor. And since he doesn't see anything wrong with dropping casual references to women as mindless bimbos, let's place him in the 1950's. Duncan is at a faculty party when the new associate professor arrives with his wife, so gorgeous and shapely one might say she looks like a porn star. Duncan enviously snickers to the other tenured professors in the corner about what hot sex the new guy must be getting, but he never speaks to the fellow's wife long enough to realize she is the smartest person in the room.
“Does the Mammoth publish you, too? Why, we are comrades in misfortune—fellow serfs! We should be friends. Shall we be friends?”
Life declines from thirty-five;
If a vendor can’t make it, he or she will most likely reach out to you as well as their back-up and notify you of the change in plans.
The pool and patio project began in June as just a little, innocent idea. I thought it would be kind of cool to have a pool and suggested maybe we try out an above ground one for a couple of years to see if we would use it, like it, etc. Aaron was not terribly gung ho on that as it would kill a big patch of yard and they are ugly besides. True statements, and after further consideration and a list of pros (I wouldn't have to go to the pee filled public pool with 87 million of my closest friends, the kids would love it, we could have nice family fun in our own backyard, it will be easy to locate our teenage children in they are hanging out in our pool) and cons (maintenance, MONEY, safety), we decided to go for it. Let the trouble begin.
Here is a layout I've been working on for weeks (lol - so sad really but you do what you can when you can!) Tobias got this Monkey last Valentines Day and he loves him still! He's getting a new one today as soon as daddy goes and gets his treat and balloon!
In fact, in retaliation, savagery returned with a vengeance as United States Marines immediately bombarded Fallujah, killing over 600 Iraqis, most of them women, children, and the elderly in the very first week of the assault in early April 2004, eleven months after George W. Bush declared “Mission Accomplished.” By the end of the year, after two massive assaults on the city by the U.S. military, over 2,000 Iraqis, including hundreds of women and children, had been killed by American soldiers, thousands more injured and at least 300,000 displaced.
The case-handling staff, when collecting evidence, may adopt the following means to collect and gather relevant evidence:
This morning dawned very differently than the morning of January 3, 1998. The Maine, weather was brutal. Fortunately, Bangor Hospital had hotel-like hospitality units with interior access to the hospital proper.
I've griped about my feeling of "homelessness." I've envied those who have a charming Hometown, USA, place to go back to during holidays and the summer--a place where they've known their friends since preschool and where they've lived in the same house their whole life. I don't think that's for me. I think it's beautiful and I still get a little jealous of it sometimes, but I'm really happy with my own situation. It's true that I don't have a place I can necessarily call home, but at the same time, I have so many homes: friends' houses, Gustavus, Visthar, Norrköping, and anywhere else where I have people that I love. I think I've really adopted the cliche phrase, "The home is where the heart is."
Saturday: Honey Soy Chicken
Foil wrap
04 When Your Mind's Made Up
Another important point to remember is that, in those days, children as young as ten years old were leaving home in search of work. They would often find work quite far from home and they would return home on rare occasions. Most of the children could only find work as servants in other, more fortunate families’ homes. However, this was one of the few days (if any) that they were allowed to take off. What you need to remember is that, in those days, most of the holidays that we know today had not been acknowledged yet and there were no real laws that forced employers to give their staff time off. Mothering Sunday was one of the occasions when everybody would return home to attend the service at their mother church. So, this was also an opportunity for the children to be re-united with their own mothers. This is probably why it is also so important today for us to take time off to spend with our mothers. We have so much to do all year long that the least we can do is give ourselves one day to spend with mum.
If you need the extra income, working from home is the way to go! By doing LiveOps, I can work in the bedroom and hear my children in the living room. I can take breaks to nurse Elias! I stop to eat lunch with them and enjoy some time between blocks. It is much different from leaving for an entire day and being gone and exhausted!
Let’s walk our path
Thanks for joining us with the Punches and Dies challenge last week - we saw lots gorgeous work from all of you, in fact we had over 200 entries which is great!
Pours a deep black, with a great deep brown head. Fair amount of roasted coffee and grain in the smell. I'm hoping it's as good as Founder's Breakfast Stout, and so far it's headed that way.
Aside from the LOLcats and the dumbfounded face of Keanu Reeves, I keep seeing the “Most Interesting Man in the World” pop up. And I thought to myself, late last night after a round of whiskey, “Shouldn’t the site mascot actually hold that title? Aside from being batshit insane, he’s been a secret agent, a cowboy, a superhero, a lawyer, a decorated combat pilot, and a nuclear physicist.” And that was just in one year.
I wasn't there so I can only convey bits and pieces without much timeline accuracy, but I know that she continued throwing up many, many times throughout the night... 30 or so was a guess. She had intense chest, arm and back pain and it was hard to breathe.
Learn and be inspired by a creative tourism experience in Thailand to discover the other you.
When in eternal lines to time thou grow’st:
6 Rafting Starlit Everglades 3:53
Hi Readers: This piece below was originally posted at The Rustic Child, a blog about kids who take risks, do chores and entertain themselves (if you can imagine!). It’s by Jilly O’Brien, a New Zealand mom of 2 who’s a teacher studying to be an educational psychologist. I asked her if I could reprint it here, it’s so inspiring, and she said yes! So — voila! L.
Sun is so much better, the birds sit on the wires and I can chirp at them. I can see little people walking by.
After showing some numbers, and how much energy I consume by my self monthly, I think its time to make step forward, if everyone monitor his bill and find the reason behind his/her consumption and solve it, we can help the environment.
We are officially sold. We are no longer part of the pharmaceutical business. We are just a nutritionals and food business. Some of my colleagues were notified already that their services are only needed until end of May.
a brisk shower
Seekae's new album +Dome is out on March 25 and I’m super excited since their previous album, The Sound Of Trees Falling On People, is one of my favourite Australian albums of all time. When I say "I'm super excited", I am talking on your behalf – I already have a copy of the album and can confirm that it is fantastic. Gnor, the first 'official' single from the album (presumably because 2010 single Blood Bank features an updated and better mix here), is one of the closest songs to the sound of their debut, making it a good jumping-off point for people looking to get enveloped by their 'ghetto ambiance' all over again.
barriers get invisible
Today’s run was give-or-take 3 miles — at most.
Why am I showing you a picture of Everclear? Because Dr. Food brought it back to me from New Jersey. Of course you can't get it in New England. As you know New England is a bit backwards when it comes to booze. I needed this Everclear to start the bitters we are making.
But it didn’t stop there. At some point in my life, gum became a dental tool. Now it’s “Dentist Approved! Long Lasting Flavor!” gum. They’re trying to make it surpass brushing our teeth! How fucked up is that! We can’t even lift a stick up to our face and move it up and down for a few minutes!
I have to drive up to my hometown this morning for family business with my family. My sister and I don’t get along, so I’m really not looking forward to sitting across from her discussing stuff. I do get to see my brother, and that is always nice. Anyways, the drive is about two hours and all I can think about is DiCarlo’s pizza.
These are just some of the adjectives used on Facebook and Twitter regarding McClatchy’s decision to shut down the copy desk and design desk at The News & Observer. That work will be done at an editing/design hub at The Charlotte Observer, which is also owned by McClatchy.
I work with a guy who used to work in the police dept., & I wondered, after reading this news -- maybe that's why he changed careers, because he saw this coming, & realized there was a significant percentage of the local population that he does not want to see without any of their clothes on.
a nice hot shower, a cup of fresh coffee.. and a few moments to myself to enjoy the quiet really is a lovely thing. there are birds singing, waves rolling in on the beach just outside my window, && the soft glow of sunrise just barely peeking in the windows. it’s the epitome of serene.
Publication Date: October 16, 2011
New building starting to pop up, right on the shores of the fishing village (what's left of it). Apparently, the government is trying to reclaim the village (fill it with dirt to build more buildings). Most of the villagers have moved on. The 'traditional fishing village' is actually more like a bunch of small boat filled with tourist....sailing around witnessing the change that is happening. I'm sad to say it's not much of a fishing village or any village...
kids dont just run away for no reason.
Fear not, I will foil their diabolical scheme. Now if I can just get a schizophrenic Frenchman on the Eurostar to translate your gibberish, we'd be in business.
The well worn path that we have followed for years is easy to follow. We know the rules, the processes, the tools, the pitfalls and all other aspects of that path.
1/2 cup slivered almonds, toasted
12.2 Many Rappers (Kenny Keys Remix)
Friday, November 11th is Veteran's Day so our challenge this time is to honor those men and women that have served our country and kept it free! TSB Challenge #19 is Home of the Brave!
Wicked is a gorgeous deep dark blood, maroon-y red creme. Not so dark that it looks black. It's a pretty sexy red, actually.
2 tbl of chopped dill
As usual I suggest you click on the photos to enlarge for better appreciation. I don't use that slide show feature, so clicking will give you a very nice sized photo. Plus, you can't read the often funny captions unless you enlarge. So click away!
$20 - 5 entries
The widespread nature of workers’ declining fortunes, even if they have not suffered unemployment, explains why it is that one-third of U.S working families are now low-income (i.e, under 200% of poverty), one lost paycheck, one illness, or one accident away from disaster. But as I have noted before, the underlying illness of stagnant wages and a weak labor market have existed before – the one-third figure discussed above is only 7% higher than before the recession, and during the previous recovery in ’02-05 we saw that figure increase, never falling below its 2007 level.
Anyway, to practice getting used to this process I did this skull. The skull is detailed but not overly complicated. This one came out so well that I bought a few more canvases that are the same size and plan to do 4 more. Light green on dark green is next. Light brown on dark brown will be the one after that. Needless to say when all 5 skulls are painted out I'll show you what they look like.
How do you think we feel? We are livid. We feel more strongly about the ban with each passing hour. Do you think we like being reminded of that oppressive boot pressing down on our face every day when we go out? To us, every No Smoking sign displayed on the frontage of every business, every railway station, every taxi, and the entire grounds of a hospital is a symbol of oppression and hate, akin to the swastika. Businesses do not have a choice -- they have to put up those signs, which must be a certain size and colour according to the law, else they are fined and possibly put out of business for non-compliance. Business owners now cower in fear of the Nanny State, unable or unwilling to fight it. Does that sound like freedom to anyone? Does that sound like a country you want to live in? Every day this smoking ban goes on is a day we are not free to make our own choices.
Jen says: I first heard of them from the ‘Scott Pilgrim’ soundtrack… their inclusion on which (with ‘It’s Getting Boring By The Sea’) speaks very highly of them. The video for IGBBTS, incidentally, features Laura-Mary looking more like a dark-haired Debbie Harry circa 1978 than anyone else in the history of the universe has ever done. Just thought this needed mentioning.
I wish I had kept a journal over the years of my classics, and every so often, not so classic comments. One that comes to mind is a question I posed to a co-worker years ago while I was working retail while attending college. I was fairly good friends with this woman, and on occasions we would have beers after work. It was strictly a platonic relationship(very rare for me in those days!) One morning we were having coffee with a few other workers, and she dropped the ” I am having a baby” blast. So I instantly responded with; “Do you know who the pop is?” Mind you, the reason I asked was because I did not know she was seeing anyone. She responded “yes” and was not offended at all. Well, my buddy sitting next to me, who was an older gent, just turned red, buried his mug in his hands, and stated, ” you idiot, did you really just say that?” Of course I did, inquiring minds wanted to know!
Ooo laa laa.
This was my third Composition but my first one of Cinematic Orchestral genre. 2 years ago, I got inspired by an epic fantasy-adventure movie named “Eragon” as i remember. Here’s a pic of the Boy named Eragon:
Check out the Amazon link now:-
Xiao Ya is beginning to tell stories and sing, is into any game that's related to water or food, and likes things that don't seem to be favorites of many toddlers, such as broccoli and brushing her teeth. She's also a clown, sometimes picking the wrong answer to a question (like a color) on purpose and laughing about it. She's fond of running around without any clothes on, waving her arms demonically, but my early gift to her teenage self is to leave no photographic trace of this particular pastime.
Accepting the call
So although I was able to work up a good sweat, I also decided not to sweat the small stuff. Thursday will come and go and I'll be ready like always. The parents will be thrilled, the kids will be happy and I'll cross the finish line with my hands held high.
4) Know your Airline’s limits: now all the size and weight limits of your airline for your luggage. Weigh your luggage beforehand to ensure it is not overweight.
Learn more about the mix of commitment, fun, hi-tech research and interaction, that makes this crowd a very special one!” Salomon Trail Running
11. Keep Tellin You Prod by DJ Babu
World Trade Center Memorial
I have been blogging since February 2009 — but I have only officially been a book blogger since September 2010. I originally blogged about writing under a pseudonym (which is now deceased.) In January of 2010, I stumbled upon the Fill in the Gaps project site and decided to read 100 classic books within five years, and post about them casually on my writing site, where I had devoted myself to giving out writing advice like the professionals (I was NOT a professional) and journaling about my own writing progress and how I felt about the writing journey.
Happy New Year to all our friends and family and those of you just stopping by. After a long break from blogging, I now have a new camera and a bit of inspiration to write and post again in 2010 so I'm hoping you all stop in occasionally to visit.
What does it mean to ‘tend the holy’? As a friend pointed out to me, when you ‘tend’ a garden, you take care of it – working the ground, weeding, watering, talking to the plants if you are so inclined.
She was a dim shape, felt as much as seen, and he seemed to be lying across her waist and hips, his head cradled in the crook of her elbow where her arm turned across to hold him. He tried to turn his shoulders, and sit up, but the Wilder kept tight hold.
- Never iron anything, just shake and pull it and hope it uncreases
Eliezer Shkolnik (Shlomo Bar-Aba) is a Talmudic re searcher who specializes in a secular view of the Jewish texts, one devoted to history. More specifically, he is a philologist studying the language of ancient texts and carrying a burden of his past research. After spending decades on a theory of an alternate Talmudic source, a rival professor accidentally discovered the physical source and, refusing to share this with Eliezer, stole all the credit for it.
I had an appointment this week on Tuesday to get my newly installed port flushed this week. Gail went along to observe and learn how. It's good I had the appointment, because over the weekend I started the familiar joint and chest aching and I have no energy. I hate it so much because I was feeling really good for nearly two months...and I just wanted it to last forever. Ha, yeah right! But it was sure a nice couple of months! My PFTs were surprising to me, they are holding steady...so they just decided to add oral cipro twice a day. Now I'm on four different oral antibiotics a day! I hope I can tolerate cipro yet, I got nauseous yesterday and awhile today. I ended up taking phenergan to help the nausea. And yes, i did eat before i took anything. I'm also to add two extra breathing treatments a day. I go back in a couple of weeks and im sureI hoping this will kick it!
Lost in ecastasy in dark, cause here I dont have to see my face.
Not only were we rejected, but their story and tone changed. All of a sudden they tell us that there had been a written offer once. . .a written offer of $380,000 that put the home under contract, and that they will not accept any offer of less than that amount. But what happened to that? Why did it fall through?
#1: Gracie FINALLY weighs over 20 lbs. We were stoked!
discussed
2 pages
To Edmund earl of Gloucester; seek him out
It is well reported that journalists from that (sarcasm warning) beacon of journalistic integrity ‘The Sun’ have been arrested by detective investigating inappropriate payments to police. The (pass the bucket) National Union of Journalists said that their members have been thrown to the wolves in a witch hunt. I would like to point out to any journalists who might find themselves reading this that at least your brethren will be presumed innocent until proven guilty, even by me. This is a lot more than you are prepared to do for Nationalists against whom any allegation is routinely given prominence in your publications and yet when the accusations are proven unjustified you have no interest. I have personal experience of this. No crocodile tears please.
Here's the three books I recommend you read aloud.
What precipitated the eruption is the debated part. There's extensive evidence of iridium at this geological layer, which suggests an impact event. Iridium is one of the two densest materials, so most of the iridium the Earth formed with quickly sunk to the center of the core during the early differentiation period. In general, if you find iridium on the surface, it came from an extra-terrestrial source.
Many of these children come to altruism a lot later than other kids. And that's ok.
"Do you know how to freeze homemade Indian food for future use? Till now, I have been making fresh meals but now at times I feel the need to have something ready and hate to go to restaurants." To freeze or not to freeze?
Have its time, but now Lord I wait on you, for a new view, a new earth, a new reason
Other characters that make the story compelling are like sub-contractors that do their specialties in “reconstructing” Charlie. Shelley Jackson, Charlie’s chocolate Barbie, basketball-playing roommate and first girl friend, adds sparkle and vivacity to life like Charlie had never seen. The bond they form is strong and one of trust. The coaches, the nerdy, unique Jerry Khan that helps Charlie’s PLAN along, the wrestlers Tex and Mac, the construction firm owner Ken Duffy, and the remarkable people associated with “The Haven” a sanctuary for women and children all influence Charlie, but none of them absolve Charlie’s sense of guilt or ease the need she has to reconnect with her mother.
Twenty-seven sounds a lot older to me than 26. Obviously it is older, but it sounds A LOT older than say 22 to 23 or 24 to 25. Maybe it is because I am now officially in my late twenties and finally feel like I have to consider myself an adult. Along those lines, this year Spencer and I will be celebrating our SEVENTH wedding anniversary. Which also sounds A LOT longer than six years of marriage.
Eventually I updated HRD to version 5 and they started to work together.
The Political blog ‘Turtle Bay and Beyond’ reported last week on an interview with CFAM’s Susan Yoshihara on the population crisis in China.
Repeat; In all landscaping endeavors, look up, your home will give you all the clues you need.
Very concerned at his song choice, I asked him if he knew what ‘ass
I'm not far off the mark. This is Assouline's description:
(Who am I kidding? I debuted almost every one of these items the moment they came in the mail.)
The reds leave, dejected
But, the main purpose of re-visiting this brew is to replace the Bobek hops. Although part of the trio that made up Styrian Goldings , I didn't like the flavour when used individually for the first time in the last brew. This time I'll be using Savinjski as the late hop and I'll be interested to see how it differs.
The French betrayal in 1967 had a positive aspect in that it taught the Israelis not to rely overly on foreign made armaments. Today, Israel has a thriving state of the art arms industry of its own with products rivaling the best made anywhere, and the advantage that they're no longer at the mercy of another country for spare parts for most of their weaponry. The two main areas the Israelis have not gone into are fighter aircraft and helicopter gunships, both of which they still purchase from the U.S. However, they have produced aircraft in the past like the Kfir and the Avi and might very well make the decision to do so again. And their armed and unarmed drones are top quality.
This post is partly inspired by Bonnie of Pixel Dust Photo Art who suggested a theme this week of altering a photograph to illustrate (no matter how abstractly) the title of a favourite book. Recently I've been reading a novel by Kate Morton called "The Forgotten Garden."
Sometimes what’s so obvious is what we’re most oblivious to. Not only are these good tips for Daylight Saving, but they can also be helpful for travel and even when kids are sick.
Where would you start? It must be like being locked overnight in your favourite store, able to take anything you want. Presumably masturbation is allowed if you're pre-maritally abstinent towards your beloved, so holding back the reservoir wouldn't be too overwhelming. I guess the whole point is having penis in vagina, so the quickest way to make that happen would be the first order of business.
♥ Arts and crafts
Yeah, I think I'll do that.
"I want to be your preferred hello and your challenging farewell." - Anonymous
Ok, since I had two bummers in a row, I decided to include a bonus page. This one is Distress Stains, my Tim Holtz Stamper's Anonymous stamps, and Distress Ink. I kept the stamps on the card in their original position since the card is almost the same size as the paper I was working with. Remember, Distress Ink is reactive. So I decided to make this page interesting by using my mini-misters to spray water on it. See how the ink bleeds through the paper? It also created some water spots where the Distress Stains are. Dried with heat gun (carefully! The other side has embossing powder, lol) and inked around edges with some more Black Soot (Distress Ink):
Dixie Brewing Co. Dixie Blackened Voodoo Lager
The inaugural version of OttH got some good reviews, but the biggest criticism was that it was a bit too sweet. Since that version, every subsequent batch has used less caramel malt. Nate's class's version cut the caramel malt in half, which lead to it being a bit to bitter. For Eric's version, we lowered the lovibond rating and reduced the caramel malt by only a quarter.
Transmission is a necessary evil of wind. Denmark is well interconnected to balance load. Canada is weak for interconnection.
This weeks theme challenge is: DRY EMBOSSING!!
Azeroth quests:
The result is I have finished all the cross stitch for the gypsy wagon and up to now I have back stitched half of the design.
1 kick
The Crescent Moon Kingdoms, land of djenn and ghuls, holy warriors and heretics, Khalifs and killers, is at the boiling point of a power struggle between the iron-fisted Khalif and the mysterious master thief known as the Falcon Prince. In the midst of this brewing rebellion a series of brutal supernatural murders strikes at the heart of the Kingdoms. It is up to a handful of heroes to learn the truth behind these killings.
1/4 POUND OF ASIAGO CHEESE DICED
Round 21: Knit 2 together, knit 2 together.
vs California 10 - 0 W Sep 28 vs Northwestern 10 - 9 W Oct 5 at Ohio State 20 - 20 T Oct 12 vs Minnesota 16 - 6 W Oct 19 at UCLA 18 - 12 W Oct 25 vs Purdue 41 - 21 W Nov 2 vs Michigan 8 - 14 L Nov 9 at Wisconsin 17 - 7 W Nov 16 at Michigan State 13 - 0 W Nov 28 1963-64 Rose Bowl vs Washington 17 - 7 W Jan 1, 1964 Previously unbeaten, #2 Illinois had an 8-7 lead with minutes left in a game at home against Michigan, when a fumble gave the Wolverines the ball 11 yards from goal, setting up Mel Anthony's winning score for a 14-8 upset. I do believe the illini would have won the national championship against Texas but never happened bummer.
What characters do you want to see make an appearance in Project X Zone? Sound off in the comments!
This being St George's Day, it is a sad to see that our "National Airline" chose to hand over three British citizens (The Channel 4 Three) to a Middle Eastern regime yesterday, rather than allow them to board the departing BA flight.
Did a basic shop and managed to turn out a delicious Prawn Cous Cous dish for dinner.
Drank some pop.
Update: July 19, 2010
One of the central ideas in Graeber’s book is his claim that communism should not be seen as an alternative system to capitalism, or feudalism, or state socialism, but rather as a mode of social life that has always been present and that is a fact of life even in the most advanced capitalist nations, such as the United States. Or, to put it as Graeber likes to: We are all communists already. When Graeber says that we are already communists, he is referring to those quite familiar situations in which we really do operate by the maxim “From each according to his ability, to each according to his need.” People of all cultures, including our own, invariably practice the communism of everyday life when dealing with their family and close friends. A mother does not expect her child to pay her for her baby-sitting services. A brother does not rent out his baseball glove to his brother on an hourly basis. If a friend is sick and needs something from the store, we pick it up for her and would never think of asking for gas money in return. (Communism of Everyday Life)
It’s in the click of my heels,
My mom did the only thing a good mom would do and attempted the cliché, “That is impossible; no one is better than you!” My mom’s voice was no comfort the first time “Bertha” got in touch with Drew. And the third and forth time. She requested his friendship, but I suspected she longed for more. I begged him to never see her again."
The best way I have found is to recrease the horizontal and vertical center lines. Then fold the top left and right points inwards to form two top triangles. Turn the model 180 degrees and repeat this last step.
That child is going to suffer significant hearing loss before she's even a teenager with the way she likes music to be "louder" all the time.
With prevention of things like gestational diabetes also helped by exercise, there are many reasons why you might begin to consider that jog. What exercise could you begin to consider that would actually help though? How about something like Yoga and Pilates? These kinds of exercises can give you the extra stamina that you need, and also give you the opportunity to make your body more flexible. With the bonus of flexibility, you can be sure that the back pain you are experiencing will be cut down. For many back pain is a really frustrating part of pregnancy, and if doing some slight exercises throughout the pregnancy can help, why you would you not even consider it? If you don’t want to consider Yoga or Pilates, then why not just a gentle walk, run or jog to the local park or shop. Anything that you can think of which will add
- But you work part-time at a restaurant as a seater, you literally just walk people over to their seats. That’s as non-critical a job as there is.
n the farm communities of western Kentucky, Republican state Rep. Dwight Butler has never lost an election, so it’s little wonder no one chose to run against him this year.
Khan is the villain. Benedict Cumberbatch is reportedly playing Khan but that this is not going to be similar to how he was portrayed previously in both film and TV forms. According to Trek Movie, they are aiming for a more “Batman Begins” feel and that Khan may be like the series’ Joker.
Yeah ache, ache beautiful for me
Five people have died from cholera in South Africa, after crossing from Zimbabwe, where a recent outbreak has killed more than 300 people.
I think that is about it. I think the bottle delabeler is heated up by now, so I am off to remove the labels from about forty cases of bottles.
unfortunately the cupcakes have been eaten, and kitty now has a home, but the dresser is still there for the taking. :) here is the original post on it. it'd be a really great dresser for a fun kid's room, or a perfect changing table for a nursery.
So that’s it for the 2010 season, its been an amazing journey and I have really exceeded my expectations and cant wait for 2011 its going to be epic!!! The next month I’m going to focus on my running form and slowly start to get back into things. I’ll probably officially start training for 2011 in February but things will start to ramp up in January. Many many thanks to all my sponsors for 2010 you all have really helped so much. And to my friends/family who’s support and inspiration I drew on every day in training/racing. Happy Holidays/New Year to all!
We know what is best for you. We will look after you.
Once you sang for spring
The French beauty company Decleor had invited me
A Glimpse
After she leaves, Mom talks to Dad about the veterinarian.
Let’s look at what our leaders say;
Unless you get all dressed up and drag your three children to the
I received the following as a comment to my last post. Since I felt it was worth a wider audience I've posted it here.
Nomination 1: Hardknott
I still love the fact that the Malaysian word for pipis is "lala". It makes dinner sound so musical. We dig into a mound of stir-fried noodles, savouring the surprise finds of pippi meat hidden within.
I have too many areas of the house which need my attention and are not hidden from view. So I'm focusing my decorative attention on the parts that can be seen.
on the first sharp north wind.
In other words, turning the study results into personal advice ends up turning patients away from what matters — their relationship with their doctor, which they can directly observe and act upon — and toward a superficial feature (weight) that might or might not contribute to it.
"Uhh...what do you need the...er....IT......for?"
And van der Post listened, not wanting
Alice is almost seven, Henry is almost two, Matt has been married to me for almost ten years, and I am almost entirely sick of writing blog posts. Almost. My household is a mad rush of diapers, snowpants, toy trains, puppets, laundry, dishes, and bad reality tv. Lather, rinse, repeat. But things are good. I grew tired of this blog, and decided a few months ago that I wanted to do a book-only blog.
Here's who will be reading:
Mark, his wife, and two friends went on a fishing trip on the friend’s yacht. They had two adventures on this yacht, but I want to focus on the second one. Mark and crew learn about a local woman who tends to sick animals, and her husband, a taxidermist. Mark goes to her to interview her for his magazine, while his wife goes to the taxidermist to stuff a fish that she had caught.
It's been quite a while since I've posted a hearth bread on this blog. Truth be told, I don't bake many hearth loaves; most of the bread consumed in our house is in toast form, so I'm usually baking bread in loaf pans to be sliced and toasted for breakfast. And (maybe because I make so many sandwich/toast loaves) I'm not very comfortable baking hearth loaves.
Anyway, Coldplay performed last night, in honor of it being "BritPop" week. They performed 2 songs. The first was "Paradise" and holy shit I loved it. LOVED it in capital letters. Here's the video.
__________
So far…at 28% through the book would I recommend reading it? Absolutely yes.
The arena in these modern, civilised times of politics, television and shopping malls is not difficult to survive in. It merely takes a single characteristic - courage.
While the meat was marinating, I worked on the vegetables, which were zucchini, Vidalia onions, corn on the cob, asparagus, and new potatoes. The zucchini were cut in half length wise and drizzled with rice vinegar and toasted sesame oil. The Vidalia onions were cut into thick slabs, skewered, then topped with a bit of honey and cayenne pepper. I skewered the asparagus to make little rafts, which I then drizzled with olive oil, squeezed on some lemon juice, and salt and pepper. For the corn, olive oil, salt and pepper.
Bing, Bing, Bing….the pinball stumbled and I was forced once again to see a person I had begun to characterize through my own selfish terms through God’s eyes. Bing, bing, bing, stay in the game. Stay with us, O Lord Jesus Christ, night will soon fall.
Blend all the ingredients together in a blender or with a hand mixer. Pour into an ice cream churner and churn for about 15 minutes. Pour into popsicle or kulfi molds and freeze until solid. If you don't have a churner pour the mixture straight into the molds and freeze. The kulfi will just be denser.
I’m building myself UP,
Duberstein’s lobbying firm is American Council of Life Insurers
I have so far to go. I make mistakes. My self-esteem is shattered and I don’t earn a living income. I struggle every day to make healthy choices and often fail. But I have a vision. I CAN be a good father. I CAN be healthy – physically and mentally. I CAN work and earn a living. While I have huge self-doubt I know that in three to six months I can get where I need to get to. I AM being a good father and I AM being healthy. Now I need to sort out the work piece and stay sober. I can do this. I have to. It has to be my path forward.
Raspberries
Seated Arm Curl: 10 @ 20 lbs; 10 @ 15 lbs
Always in those circumstances, people say, “Well, make peace.” Fine. Great. I want peace. We have to seek peace. But right now I’m facing these houses and they’re firing at me. Talking about a peace conference now is not really the point. Or people say, as with the cop facing the murderous bank robber, “Don’t shoot him. We need to clean up the neighborhood so that the people have jobs and don’t turn to crime.” Again, great, yes, that’s true. We have to create a situation where there aren’t criminals in that neighborhood, but right now I’ve got an armed robber in the bank and he’s threatening to kill his hostages. So, right now I have to protect the citizens of my state, and if I don’t fire at any of the houses that have children on the roof, then I won’t be able to protect my civilians. And that’s unthinkable, out of the question.
Mr. Wagner was then working for MTV, and feeling guilty about it. He was a guy with a ‘PBS mind,’ as he puts it, ‘in a jump-cut, sound-bit MTV world, trying to figure out what I can do to make it a better place.
You need to be aware of two things, though. First, your memory of that-blog-post-that-filled-in-the-missing-piece-to-the-scene-you-were-working-on might have gotten the memory of the-one-piece-jumper-suit-you-saw-someone-wearing-and-made-you-fear-they-might-be-coming-back-in-style spilled all over it. Second, all those new memories that get poured into this bin every night fall on top of all the other memories there, pushing everything down a bit. The ones at the very bottom get pushed out that tube, and fall right out of your brain. So you don't want to wait too long to go dumpster diving, or it'll be lost forever.
Here is what you can do to take back your time and control of your own destiny – Make a list on a piece of paper of all the relationships in your life (ie. family, friends, anyone you spend time with). In order to make sure you are surrounded by healthy relationships ask yourself these questions of each person you have listed:
So I spread a THIN layer (the pie should be savory, not sweet!) on the pizza, along with the curried chicken and veggies (use a slotted spoon, so as not to get your crust wet), along with a chopped tomato and parsley and the Feta cheese. (Yeah, didn’t have cilantro…the parsley worked fine in a pinch.)
This is for Edward Burton's moleskine of The Flying Moleskines and my response to his music theme. Until I read Edward's introduction in his book, I had no idea what I was going to paint for his music theme. When I read "people dancing", I knew immediately I would attempt this painting.
The trouble with, “A place for everything and everything in its place” is that there’s always more everything than places. ~Robert Brault
Today I received an email from one Geraldine Mills, a widely-published novelist, short story writer and poet (Wow! Not short on talent). In conjunction with my university, she has become my editor/mentor for a wonderful, blissful year of incredibly challenging work. I will concentrate on the development of my novel during the course of the year, submitting a few thousand words in my weekly revision sessions with her, for my third year undergraduate studies. This is the year I’ve been waiting for since I started college: being able to focus entirely on just creative work.
He truly is a very nice guy, now I know why I never met her brother before. She was saving the best for last.
"I don't intend to do that." I say sharply, "I like the position I have and don't want to be pushed out."
Plasma TV technology consists of hundreds of thousands of tiny pixel cells which are held between two panels of glass. Those cells hold a mixture of gasses. Electrical pulses excite the gas causing them to glow and produce light. Each pixel is made of three florescent lights.
I’m having an emotional roller coaster day today. As we sailed towards the Dun Laoghaire port this morning I was nearly overcome (nearly, not completely, ’cause I’m a manly man, but I’m sensitive), as I thought about how many generations at least half my family had lived here, and that if my great grandparents hadn’t been brave enough to get on a boat at a port just like that one, I wouldn’t exist. I was overcome with excitement as I had the opportunity to be a huge tourist, and take tours of both the Jameson & Guinness factories, then partake in some of the homeland’s finest libations.
I also like the way the Galleria deals with that horror of horrors today: empty retail store fronts. The Galleria uses architectural elements of empty storefronts to showcase current retailers and their offerings. You might be excused from enjoying the display and not noticing an empty shop behind. In a rare misstep, one well done display window is located next to waaaay too much empty white space where previously lurked a store front that no longer leads into an open shop. Most often Galleria paints these empty storefronts in an appealing color that works so much better than expanses of white.
“Ok then. I’ll call you when im done.” Said that guy again.
This is a photo of my grandfather & I. He loved his grandchildren.....
‘Is that the one about the Grandmother?’ Jane asked.
9. Epidemiology: Oh, come one, there’s no way this episode was getting left out. Zombies! Costumes! George Takei narration! The government erased everyone’s memory! And I think you know I have a thing for ABBA stuff. What I really love about this episode, more than the holiday theme, is the twist that Troy, not Jeff, was the big hero. Troy’s arc this season was by far my favorite. My biggest complaint is that we never find out what was up with that cat.
What part of the gameday experience are you most looking forward to on Saturday?
For the custard
“As an African American woman it galls me. I don’t even like to watch it. I felt like it plays into every sort of patronizing stereotype of black people,” MSNBC contributor Joy-Ann Reid said. “‘Oh, here is this little lady let me give her 50 bucks’. . . I think it plays into that conservative meme, that you don’t need actual programs that the government puts in place to help people in need, we’ll just give them charity, I’ll just give him 50 bucks.”
I'll pick 6 winners--all you have to do is leave me a comment and then GO share the word. Someone out there today needs to hear this message--help me share it today! Let's spread the word and love! Feel free to GRAB my blog candy pic above or blinkie and link at your blog/facebook if you so desire.
I have been subbing this week at my children's school. This morning I got ready and E(my 8 year old)asks me "where's your gun?". I tell her the law does not allow me to carry my gun into a school. "But what if a bad guy comes in?" "Who will stop him?" "A good guy, should be able to have a gun."
-Tweet about this giveaway, with a link to this post (+2 extra entries)
I have internet and I am back, as promised.
and I would love to be able to emulate Karen McTavish's free-motion quilting style. At the other end of the spectrum, I want to do more hand quilting! And I have been meaning to make a kaleidoscope quilt. That must happen... I could go on, but I'll stop there.
I call my soft drinks “pop”. I currently live in Wisconsin and everyone around me calls it “soda.” It seems like a weekly occurrence that someone, somewhere on campus brings up the pop/soda difference (same goes for bubbler/drinking fountain/water fountain). Regardless of what you call it, Coke is Coke. The Coca-Cola brand has been around for over 100 years and over 1.7 billion servings are sold daily.
Anyway, recently, I was hiking with a small group of students near the Nature Center when suddenly we heard a tremendous popping noise. My reaction was involuntary, "Hey, what was that?!" We heard laughter-- lot's of people laughing in fact-- and then Pete, Dodge Naturalist Extraordinaire, poked his head around the corner of the building. Pete smiled innocently, "We were just exploding dry ice."
7 Khoon Maaf (Seven Murders Forgiven) (2011; Priyanka Chopra, Neil Nitin Mukesh, John Abraham, Irrfan Khan, Aleksandr Dyachenko, Annu Kapoor, and Naseeruddin Shah; directed by Vishal Bhardwaj).
At such times, you’re so humble you go on your knees or
11. Music From The Spheres (White, Argent) 8:59
I really don't remember much about the next 2.1 miles. I didn't look at anything other than the pavement 5 feet in front of me and I was just counting my steps and occasionally reminding myself to relax my arms. At one corner I did look back and saw the next woman was Melissa from my running group but unless I blew up, she wouldn't catch me. Learning that was probably bad because then I told myself it was okay to relax and take it easy for 100 steps. Mentally I am not strong right now as I had to battle my head and convince myself it is not okay to walk quite a few times. Not a good thing when you are considering walking in something as a short 5K! But mental toughness in racing takes time for me, so hopefully it will come around.
and left
Basically I’m saying, use these tutorials for the purpose they were created. To teach you various aspects of whatever your area of specialty. Do them, learn from them and use the concepts learnt to improve the quality of your work.
Precisely where the Coptic Pope comes in the global Christian pecking order is complicated by the fact that (as a consequence of various splits and schisms down the centuries) there are both Greek Orthodox and Latin claimants to the Holy Throne of St Mark, though neither have large numbers of followers. But traditionally Alexandria ranks at number three after Rome and Constantinople. To complicate matters, although the head of the church is patriarch of Alexandria his cathedral, as well as his official residence, is in Cairo. And has been since the eleventh century. But I suppose that when you've got a title as long as that one you're better off leaving well alone.
- Vic DiCara
Perhaps its spirit remained,
I left the house and now I need personal items from the home.
The great achievement of "The Home of the Green Arrow and Friends" is that Green Arrow, while exposing news events, also had the brains and foresight to develop a team of outstanding writers who are beginning to articulate a coherent patriotic move to re-construct our ways and communities. Meanwhile, Sarah: Maid of Albion’s blog is important in exposing modern political myths and media lies.
Red, White & Blue Berry Trifle
Appearance: Pours a clear brown with a fluffy off white head. Head retains at about 3 to 4 fingers.
10. And why have the Taino people of the Caribbean and those in the US,whose ancestors have paid such a huge price for the misfortune of being"discovered", been erroneously declared extinct and are therefore denied legal recognition by the government?
I was demoralized and frustrated. But I tried to remind myself why I’d started writing in the first place: because I love to write. If that was true, then I would write a dozen novels even if not a single one ever saw the light of day. Despite this realization, I knew that publication was a goal of mine, so I followed up with all the agents who hadn’t responded yet. After a few days, one of them wrote back to me and said, “Hey, we must have missed this the first time around, but we like what we see.” That person ended up becoming my agent, the lovely and talented April Eberhardt from April Eberhardt Literary. From there, she and I worked to polish the manuscript, and April sold it in four weeks. Cue the cartwheels and caviar!
Hundreds of thousands perished in the Battle of Berlin — including untold numbers of civilian men, women and children — while countless more were left homeless in the ruins. But it was two particular deaths, those of Adolf Hitler and his longtime companion and (briefly) wife Eva Braun, in a sordid underground bunker on April 30, 1945, that signaled the true, final fall of the Third Reich.
During my formative years I didn't have to deal with rejection since I was the most popular kid in high school. Cheerleaders, hot teachers and Hispanic custodians would throw themselves at me regularly. OK, that's completely untrue. I wasn't exactly a Lothario back in my high school days. In fact, rejection was not even an issue since teenage girls weren't interested in short, pimple-ridden sixteen year-olds without a car.
It is usual to write ravi and saraswati though there is only one va letter in samskRta.
I remember reading E.M. Bounds and in one of his books he was sharing how we are a golden pipe, and that God’s anointing flows through that golden pipe to be given to others for needs. He said that if the pipe is clogged with mess (sin), then the oil cannot reach the people. We as Ambassador’s of heaven need to rid ourselves sin, mess, so we can complete our purpose and destiny.
He also pointed out that the rally had marred Bersih’s demand for “better governance” as it was a case of not practising what it preached.
like my arms around you
Thank you Mom for always mixing up words like when had just learned to drive and borrowed a friends car, it was a Corvair or was it a Corvette.
4/17 Dan Wells at Bookalicious
But it's getting tired, and weary of holding back the mighty dam!
Just when I think these two can't get any sillier, I read another adventure. I just love these two friends. Both Gerald and Piggie are fun characters. Both have their silly sides! Do you have a favorite Elephant and Piggie book?
The pav's are also nicely heated on a pan with butter!
1 starfruit, sliced horizontally and peeled. (Save biggest piece for garnish.)
2 strode
3. Revolutionize our culture. What does Aashika mean by “we don’t have the culture to combat these issues”? Can’t money solve everything? Aashika believes that money is not a sufficient solution. In order to properly combat human trafficking and CSE, we must work with young people who have never heard about such issues before. Breaking Heels is a social enterprise that seeks to revolutionize our current culture (or rather, the general indifference we have in regards to human trafficking). Aashika created Breaking Heels as a way to involve everyday consumers to start talking about the subject and internalizing its relevance to us. “I want each of my products to be a conversation starter,” she states, in order to intrigue more people to begin asking questions, and to start understanding the ever-growing impact of modern slavery in our daily lives. On top of raising awareness, Aashika remarks that raising awareness in context is key. The best way to get the message across and to intrigue people to actually start caring, Aashika says, is by bringing up these issues in relevance to our daily culture and by instilling the mindset to everybody that buying sex and exploiting others is unthinkable. She provides the examples of drunk driving and having unprotected sex (with condoms) as issues that once were socially acceptable, but are now considered unthinkable by popular culture. For Aashika, in order to change our current ways of thinking about sex trafficking, we must approach the issue in the same way, by embedding its unlawfulness in our popular culture. She says to me, “Why we think it’s okay to sexually exploit people… It’s beyond me.”
“RESOLVED, That the American Bar Association urges that, where possible in the context of the proceedings before them, U.S. federal, state, territorial, tribal and local courts consider and respect, as appropriate, the data protection and privacy laws of any applicable foreign sovereign, and the interests of any person who is subject to or benefits from such laws, with regard to data sought in discovery in civil litigation.”
The traveling “Ramp it Up” exhibit contains 28 objects and 45 images, including a never-before-exhibited 1969 image taken by skateboarding icon C.R. Stecyk III, of a skate deck depicting traditional Native imagery. Stecyk, a co-founder of the Jeff Ho Surfboards and Zephyr Productions surf shop in Santa Monica, was featured in the skater documentary Dogtown and Z-Boys (2001), as well as being featured in Lords of Dogtown (2005). Another Zephyr highlight from the “Ramp it Up” exhibit is a 1973 home-movie footage of surf team members Ricky and Jimmy Tavarez. These brothers are citizens of the Gabrielino-Tongva Tribe.
Design Resource
Although economic recovery in Larimer County remains slow, there are a few bright spots:
Several years later, my husband, Barry, and I drove to the Broads to meet my mum and stepdad for a day on the water. Mum and I were on the boat, unpacking the food for the day. Step-dad and Barry were in the dinghy (for some reason). There was a kerfuffle of raised voices:
17- Jindalee Operational Radar Network (JORN) Laverton, West Australia
Winterland, San Francisco, CA - October 31, 1966
Bygones.
The Muppets
10 Cry Mercy,Judge
Miho Harasawa, a spokeswoman for Tokyo Blue Note, the last venue Dunn played, confirmed he died alone early Sunday. She had no further details.
Dogfish Head comes in with a different idea, they make it taste like a pumpkin not pumpkin pie, they also introduce a brown sugar flavor that really helps to make this beer drinkable compared to other pumpkin ales. It pours a nice orange/amber color more like a brown ale (Newcastle) than an Oktoberfest. You can smell all of the spices: cinnamon, brown sugar, all spice and nutmeg. A pretty full bodied beer and I probably could only drink the one at a time. The pumpkin taste is very apparent but not overwhelming and there is a pretty nice hoppy bitterness to finish it off. Which is why I probably liked it more than other pumpkins.
Yet superstition regarding the ‘mysteriousness’ of cats persists, and I wonder whether it is a product of ‘story’ rather than any demonstrable ‘real-life’ facts. In other words, is the sheer amount of stories about evil/supernatural felines the reason we continue to hold this notion of the ‘power of cats’. Rather than any actual quality in them, it is the perpetuation of the superstition through fiction that puts us in this metal state.
Nina Bagley i don't "get into" a creative groove. i just go sit down at my table (my very messy table!) and begin to pull things together, willy nilly - a strand of beads here, an antique focal finding there, some words snipped from an old, old book - the groove gets me into it, rather than the other way around.
Our new Canon Sureshot A1200 malfunctioned during the tour, so I didn’t get many pictures. It is going back and a new one is on the way. We have not had good luck with cameras.
However, the traditional Western Satsang model can be helpful. There’s still a time and place for it. The photos and flowers are gestures of respect. In that kind of setting it is implicit that the teacher is enlightened and the people in the audience are not enlightened. Some people benefit from that kind of dynamic.
I just often see parents in grocery stores or other outings shouting at the kids or being angry with them for what? For being kids? For asking questions? For wanting their attention? And the parent is mad because they are wanting to hurry and get out of the store, or hurry and get back to what? Something important? What is more important than raising another human being? (Granted, I realize we all have bad days, and I'm sure I'll be that parent in the grocery store at one point or another. I'm not trying to judge, just point out an example.)
OK then.
PCS is balloting members for strike action across all the contact centres in Jobcentreplus in the UK including 5 offices in Wales. Our members gave solid support for 2 days strike action in January in 7 of these offices, including Newport, which have been changed from benefit processing centres into contact centres. This has already showed the determination of our members to fight for better working conditions and crucially the ability to provide good quality services to the public. However management have failed to take notice of this strength of feeling about the need to improve the way that we deliver services. So we have had to escalate the dispute to the whole contact centre network.
One of the early quilts I made was black with bright pieced blocks, and as was the fashion back then (or maybe I was just sadly doing it wrong!) I used a thick polyester batting when I quilted it (or tried to quilt it).
*sigh
If you're hopping here from Lindsy's blog, you're on the right path. If not, start at the Your Scrapbook Place so you don't miss out on any fun! In order to get a chance for some blog candy, follow the Scrapbook Place Challenge Blog and leave a comment at every stop on the hop.
In local matters, Wickets and the Gotham Club have had better days. They were lacking a few regular players. Their labor shortage cost them, as the Gothams earned no victories Sunday. The outcome of their first contest against the Capitals was one they might rather forget. That is, until they went down in similar fashion to the Club from Flemington. Losers of two and with spirits down, Bugs stayed positive and expressed excitement regarding the Gothams' home opener on historic Governors Island this coming weekend. Governors Island and Vintage Base Ball seem like a perfect fit. The backdrop of the NYC skyline should be spectacular.
No, there is not a time limit to complete the challenge. This is for you so that you can study and learn to apply God's truths to your daily life! You do what you can when you can. On occasion, I may offer RAKs, and at those times there will be a deadline. Watch out for those. :) You may join this challenge at ANY time throughout the year!
I'm from the planet Xanadu.
Great! Although a few students struggled, most students rose to the challenge and actually mastered the material. Students actually went back to material they didn’t understand right away and took the time to master it since they knew they were accountable for it. More students came to me asking how to solve problems they got wrong on assessments. Most importantly, students under LOBG had clearly mastering the material at a much higher level than most students under points-based grading systems in previous terms.
Wow. How short your memory is. And how big of a pox you have left on this country. Do you realize that you got rightly butt-whipped in 2008? So don't confusing the current animosity towards Democrats as an acceptance of your agenda. Quite frankly, you're way more lost than the two entities above. You seem to have no road map out of the mess you have largely created, other than "Democrats suck." You rail against big government, but can't show how the lack of government is going to help people who you seem to be hell-bent on leaving in the lurch. Government won't solve all our ills, but get a grip: lack of government won't solve them either.
When I took on the role as "wedding planner", they still had not bought or decided on any kind of wedding favors. After racking my brain, I thought about a CD with songs from their wedding. The bride and the groom are both musical people, so it seemed to really fit them. The bride loved the idea, so I got to work making a playlist in my iTunes account. Then, I burned 85 CDs, made some labels w/ a thank you from the bride and groom and a list of the songs. I put the CDs in some clear jewel cases and tied them off with some raffia. If I would have had more time and a bigger budget, I would have ordered something like these...
This is a very teeny, tiny portion of my fabric stash. There is four more huge totes in my closet. A bit of this is fabric that will be making it's way to Cambridge very soon. There is dress fabric and some tapestry fabric I bought to make a knitting bag. Except I need to clean off the dining room table to set up my sewing machine. That never lasts more than an hour as there no space in the closet we call our kitchen.
1969: Mick Jagger was fined £200 for drugs charges
- trying to learn how to live by myself. it isn't really that easy- in a time span of 3 weeks i've cooked once. i'm serious. and i've slept in almost every morning since i don't have my mom to drag me out of bed at 6.30 am. i know i know, pathetic..
Howie Emerson – electric and acoustic guitars
7. Sequence 7 (1:41)
c) No big deal if you call me "Holly" from time to time. I realize this is an abrupt change, that not everybody reads every post, and I won't be upset or anything. I expect to be "Holly/Cliff" for a while and that's okay.
Thanks for taking a peek and for taking the time to leave a comment - I really appreciate them and love having the chance to take in your creations too. Have a great week and a safe and happy halloween!
"Bob was an enthustiastic member of any team he played for. In those days - back in the forties and fifties - Bob's hair was a shock of ginger. This led to his sobriquet "Dirty Ginger Bob" for he was, indeed, possibly the dirtiest player ever to grace the amateur leagues of the North West."
If we read the recent discourse by Pope Benedict XVI on prayer which is on Jesus` prayer at the institution of the Eucharist, the depth of Papa`s painting is uncovered.The work perfectly illustrates what occurred at the First Mass celebrated by Saint John of Matha and its effects on Saint John and his ministry
Sometimes, these visits are just for a nose round the house and a wander in the gardens - and the tea, of course, but sometimes the visit has a direct bearing on my writing. I choose particular houses for particular periods, particular characters. It is a quick, shorthand way of getting into their lives.
VISUALS: A great show to watch in HD: Tons of close-up gruesome surgery scenes, tons of beautiful women, tons of intense situations.
Tracey
I approached the front desk and the woman had the look on her face which told me she was not speaking to a normal, every day guy. It was what I like to call, "the cutesy smile", on her face that told me... "yeah... I know!". It was not a look of disgust but rather one of interest and her tone changed to one that I often see women give to other women but not to men. Directing me to the parts department, I then thanked her and followed her directions around and to the back of the store. As I passed the snack and sandwich counter at the dealership, I noted a woman and a man standing about behind the counter. The man didn't even notice my passing but the woman... the woman immediately locked on to me and did a full scan in the span of a micro-second. A second later, she made a point to say hi to me to which I responded in kind. She had a curious and welcoming smile on her face similar to that of the woman at the reception desk. I don't know if she was waiting to hear my voice but I am sure she was curious to I was thinking. I responded using my "in-between" voice just to be safe.
We are still working on finishing a few details in this room, window treatments, pillows and a couple of other things, but you can bet I'll be sharing the full "after" once it is done, so stay tuned!
We just have to take off the lie in our hearts that says, “God doesn’t love me.”
The party was was so much fun. One of NJ's state senators, Ronald Rice, Sr., and Newark's coucilwoman at large, Mildred Crump, was in attendance. I was fortunate to have an opportunity to perform before them. The music played was very good and a variety. People danced and had a good time. My mom, sister and boyfriend joined me on this adventure. The food was amazing and everyone had a great time. Here is a video of my performance and some photos.
Since March 2011, reports of arsonists and gunmen amongst Syria’s opposition have been included in reports regarding the unrest in Syria, albeit buried under sensational headlines of the Syrian government’s “brutality.” More recently, Human Rights Watch (HRW) has conceded that indeed the Syrian opposition “Free Syrian Army” is conducting widespread, systematic abuses including the kidnapping, torture, and murder of both security forces and civilians.
"This family, Mum," she said looking around at us all. "And this family," she added, nodding down at her book. "There are a LOT of similarities."
make for the easiest of transitions and, when she meets local playwright, Alastair McInnes, who’s sworn he’ll never become involved with another actress again, sparks fly, and the sleepy village of Lochnabrae will never be the same again.
One of the bankers was reported to have resigned abruptly in the same month while the former school principal has also left the school.
MUCH REMAINS TO DO
The flavor of this Tomato Jam is reminiscent of chili sauce. It is a little sweet, a little sassy with the cinnamon and ginger, and then the pow of the red pepper flakes hits you and your mouth grins in happiness. I loved it with cream cheese on bagels, but plan to try it on my favorite turkey burger recipe, as well. I also think it would be a good addition to a plate of sharp cheddar cheese and crackers for snacking. Nobody is in a jam with Tomato Jam On My Plate.
He never answered my prayers! He never fulfilled my ‘high-priority’ wishes! He never responded when I cried for help! Did he forget me thinking that I would love him forever as usual? Or, being I am one in million of his sons, am I being ignored? I could not digest the truth that he ignored me! When I prayed him that much why should he ignore me?
As for this book release party, I wanted to prove that just because your books aren’t sold in a bookstore with a publisher who can secure a big event, it doesn’t mean you’re incapable of having a big event.
Instead of just going ahead with a drink in the house (as my mother makes it so readily available) or sneaking an alcoholic beverage out of the house, I actually used a tool that is taught in a program I am currently in now...to reach out to another alcoholic. I found myself talking to another alcoholic whose name I got off from a list of phone numbers of other female alcoholics (as part of the program it is strongly suggested to connect with the same sex). We spoke for a good hour or so.
Recipe called for a little bacon in there. I put chorizo. "You say potato...I say PATATO. You say bacon I say CHORIZO. Potato, PATATO. Bacon, CHORIZO. Lets call the whole thing off". Sorry. I don't know what is wrong with me today. Oh be quiet. I am NOT like this everyday. Dr. Food don't you DARE say anything. Crack an egg into the damn potato.
Coniston Brewing Co. Ltd Old Man Ale
Athlete’s Foot
- The Parental Alienation Debate Belongs in the Courtroom, Not in DSM-5
I crack up every time I see a cheap copy of The TD. It’s usually centered around three guys, blogging about garbage nobody cares about and the worst part is, it’s five-week old garbage. Then, as usual, the page folds up as quick as it was registered. Us? We’re expanding from not only the blog posts to video interviews, but working on a podcast to broaden our brand. We aren’t going away, closing up or quitting because some brat with MyFi thinks they can just copy us and beat us at our own game. Wrong.
Behav Modif 1999 Jul;23(3):379-402 Lichstein KL, Peterson BA, Riedel BW, Means MK, Epperson MT, Aguillard RN Department of Psychology, University of Memphis, TN 38152, USA. Internet Health Library
Definitely a bummer, especially since it meant an unplanned rest day.
Five meters from the facility, a tentacle whipped out, wrapping around Lorne's ankle. He crashed to the ground. Twisting over to one side, he landed on his shoulder, in an attempt to keep Bryce unharmed. His maneuver failed and the baby wailed in pain. The Erebus yanked the screaming boy from his arms.
Sistahs, the world has heard our call. We are here, ready, armed and dangerous in a four inch heel.
the perfume
Justin Kirk- Thanks for manning the door, and being our scary man bouncer! Five Dollars!
When I first started this venture, I used Epicurious for my needs. I love love love cooking gourmet (NO SHIT SHERLOCK, for my next trick I'm going to invent the broom) so Epicurious was a *perfect* match for my style. It also has a nifty habit of being searchable by ingredient, food type (seeing as I'm kosher and all that) and meal type. I find, for beginner CSA-ers, this is an excellent choice to start. Especially if you really want to expand your cooking horizon.
Behind the gearcase, the rear impact structure is mounted midway between the beam wing and floor, fully exposing both the beam wing and allowing airflow into the central boat tail shape of the diffuser. As the diffuser was covered up, its not clear if there are features to drive airflow into the starter motor hole. A new feature on the beam wing is an upswept centre section, the extra angle of attack in the middle 15cm of the wing having a slot to help keep the airflow attached. The upper rear wing is a new design albeit similar the short chord DRS flap wing, we saw introduced at Suzuka last year. The DRS pod is still mounted atop the rear main plane and its hydraulics fed to it through the rear wing endplates. The flaps junction with the endplates follows recent McLaren practice with a complex set of vents aimed at reducing drag inducing wing tip vortices.
I have things to do. MANY things to do. I could work 24/7 for the next 3 months, and I'd still have things that were late. But, I am not getting it done. Heck, I'm not even getting started. I try to tell myself there will be rewards, and that progress comes from completion. When I get my "list" completed, I'll be able to move on to the next thing. I guess some part of me just doesn't believe it.
When white gold rings are new they are coated with another white metal called Rhodium. Rhodium is a metal very similar to platinum and Rhodium shares many of the properties of platinum including its white color.
The film launched young director Steven Spielberg to stardom and made millions of people afraid to step foot in the ocean, myself included.
I’m a work in progress. In an ideal world, all rooms in my house would be a minimalist, zen-like space, brightly illuminated and clean. But first, I need to train myself.
Believe it or not, sharing this space with my portfolio turns out to be a good catalyst for blogging. I do check out my stats regularly to see who ends up here, and how.
Fourth, and finally, some prime lenses include a depth of field guide imprinted upon the focus scale. Here is an example of my 50mm AF Nikkor lens:
What tipped the balance towards foreign takeovers in the late Nineties and 2000s were three key factors: the cheap cost of borrowing; liberal takeover rules; and the presence of global investment banks in the City, with ready access to the world’s capital.
2 c soy milk
what it meant all along.
First into the hissing cauldron goes the soft, squishy base
"Call me Jack. Jack Overton's my name."
To be honest, I’m really not a big beer drinker. Only recently have I opened up to trying new and exotic beers. So far, only a few in particular have really hit the spot for me. For those who are not really beer drinkers, but are willing to give the good ones a try, I really recommend trying Franziskaner, one of Jeff’s personal favorites.
(10:23 a.m.)
Lord of the Rings by J.R.R. Tolkien--read 0 out of 4 (series finished) You know, Frodo and all the rest on their epic adventure.
No more of OUR blood for THEIR profit. Even in the “off” chance that this bill does not get signed into Federal law, we should do everything we can as parents, educators, community leaders and peace advocates to keep our young people from dying for the people who are mandatory draftees under The Casey Sheehan “End to War” Bill.
By 2011 I thought I had it sussed - I was all about the SMART goal, with specifics. Do this once a week. Don't eat that. But by far the most disheartening part of resolutions is opening up the bag on New Year's Eve and being confronted with the unhappy truth that the resolutions we make every year, however we word them, boil down to more or less the same thing: a thing which we still have not achieved. And if we rely on a magical date to get us going, it's probably never going to happen.
See... rustic. Haha. Anyways, it's delicious. I'll have to work on the crust execution next time. I really like the Pippins. They have this old-fashioned tart taste like the apples that used to grow on our property when I was a kid and they held up well in the pie. I'm looking forward to going back to the orchard for fresh picked apples. They're the best!
Well, I wasn't nervous until I went to the "meet the teacher" day on Tuesday. I was greeted warmly by the teachers and everyone was very excited to see Joaquin. The teachers (all 3 of them) said they have been looking forward to Joaquin attending the preschool. I picked up the preschool newsletter and the calendar of activities planned and made sure that Joaquin would be on the roster and we happily went home. I eagerly sat down to read through all the paperwork, so thrilled for Joaquin, and then it hit me. I read that one of the first activities next week is to bring in a photograph of your family to share with the class. Oh my gosh. How is Joaquin going to share with the class? He can't talk. It hit me. I mean sure, he can identify each of us in the photograph with prompting and I'm sure he will smile and point at his family members but that's about it. Typical three year olds talk. Some talk A LOT. But I'm certain every child in that room will be able to talk about their family. Joaquin won't. I get teary eyed just thinking about it.
“Slaves, Obey your Masters,” a quote taken from the Bible (Colossians 3:22) was used in early March on a Pennsylvania Billboard in a racially diverse neighborhood. Reading the text (used out of context) alone may not send you running to the nearest NAACP office, however, when coupled with the imagery of a black slave with a collar around his neck the entire perspective has changed. An atheist group in Pennsylvania placed the above billboard in such an area causing a large outcry in the black community. The billboard did not remain up very long and was ripped down by citizens within this community. The local NAACP is and Pa Human Rights Coalition is investigating the incident and meeting with the atheist organization.
She smiled even brighter “Who are you?”
I mentioned that I have been drinking good beer again. Must be the fall weather. So after all my name dropping, I thought that I should throw another actual beer review into the mix. It's been too long.
The common name "blue false indigo" is derived from it being used as a substitute for the superior dye producing plant, namely Indigofera tinctoria.
What then, would constitute a viable, reasonable set of strategic objectives for a British paramilitary organization or organizations to formulate after a descent into the widespread ethno-sectarian violence we predict here? Most obviously, it would include the following:
So instead, I’m sitting inside (the sun has just begun to stream through my open window), tallying up the week’s events. Here are the week’s Sassy Sundries (Warning: Contains Grey's spoilers):
State Rep. Scott Petri, R-178, is the primary sponsor for HB 551 and 552 to establish a defined contribution plan for both the Public School Employees’ Retirement System and State Employees’ Retirement System.
2 TB salt
First published on Mon, April 02, 2012.
Row 12- (1sc in 7sc, 2sc in next) (54)
Any persons convicted of criminal acts during the current London riots should have all financial benefits removed. No tax payer should have to contribute to those who have destroyed property, stolen from their community and shown a disregard for the country that provides for them.
My days have been a clockwork of hectic, but now we settle in for spiced and flickering nights with each other and the dark fathoms-deep Dartmoor sky. I want to wish you all the most wonderful Yuletide and a year of good true adventures to follow. Thank you most earnestly for all your kind kind words and for your support and purchases and donations this year, and for continuing to read and to look at what I scatter here with such delight, it really does mean a great deal to me. Thank you to all those who snapped up the winter cards, I was unprepared for the enthusiastic uptake! There'll be more available in the new year when my shop reopens. Before too long, I'll gather all the loose strings of things still to tell, but for now, on this Night Before Christmas, I wish for something unexpected and wonderful in each of your stockings hanging now by your fires, and I leave you with words from one of my most cherished writers - someone I would have dearly loved to meet, someone who for me in the winter, becomes a kind of godmother through her wise and quiet words - Tove Jansson, who brings us snow...
To see more reviews I would recommend the site Rotten Tomatoes:
The festival of stones, centers around the autumn and winter festivals,
Denise Lombardozzi ceramics. the process is enthralling & therapeutic. i think i would thoroughly enjoy creating organically shaped frames for my pieces. slopping in slip, as it were!
Did you know that April designs blogs...SUPER CUTE ONES...and she teaches blog design classes. Yep! I've taken a few classes from her...they are GREAT! April has taught me so much in the ways of blog design...THANK YOU APRIL!
-When I came home from work last Friday, I open the door and stepped in about an inch of water. Reed had put too much toilet paper in there and it was pouring water. The hardwood floors in my hallway are still drying out. I really hope there is not permanent damage.
Once luxuriant African states fall into crime and poverty, once prosperous, economically successful Detroit descends in to crime and poverty, even hunger is there now; but progressives pretend we are progressing. Not even New Orleans penetrated their bubbles. They go on holiday to Jamaica where safe areas are sectioned off for tourists, but do not connect that reality with our inner cities which are no-go areas for Whites. Even when Muslims blow up trains and there are almost weekly terror trials going on, they dream that we are all coming together.
Here I am, late again! You were 11 months old on March 14, and time is just flying by. I cannot believe that in a couple of short weeks, you will be one!
I had a fantastic response to my button post so I know a lot of you are as addicted to buttons as me! NoodleBubble is running a fab button swap on her blog which I've just signed up to. Pop over and have a look!
He won't come visit me because
Possibilities ended with an auto accident last Friday. Although she was taken away from him on that day, the memories and time he spend with her will live forever.
19. I do not see how one can hold that Father, Son and Holy Spirit must each have His own “attribute of self-existence,” as Reymond demands (A New Systematic Theology of the Christian Faith, p. 326), without breaking them into three Gods; and I see no Scriptural warrant for insisting upon self-existence as an “attribute” proper to the Son. It is more correct to say that self-existence pertains to the essence of divinity, which the Son shares, but not to the hypostasis of the Son as such. So we must reject Reymond’s idea that “it detracts from the glory of the Son” when an “attribute of self-existence” is not ascribed to the Son. As Charles Hodge says, “self-existence, independence, etc., are attributes of the divine essence, and not of one person in distinction from the others. It is the triune God who is self-existent and independent. Subordination as to the mode of subsistence and operation, is a scriptural fact; and so also is the perfect and equal godhead of the Father and the Son, and therefore these facts must be consistent.” (Systematic Theology, vol 1, p. 474.) Again, the motive for this appears to be good—Reymond imagines that he is defending the “glory of the Son” (p. 328) by rejecting the Nicene formulations—but we must be careful not to deny part of the Truth while defending another part of it. Tertullian once observed (in Against Praxeas, chap. 1), Varie diabolus aemulatus est veritatem. Adfectavit illam aliquando defendendo concutere. (In various ways the devil has vied with the Truth. Sometimes he has tried to shake it by defending it.)
I am a HUGE bargain shopper. Clearance and sales racks, here I come! My top hot spots are America's Thrift (only located in the southern states), Ross, Old Navy, Salvation Army, Goodwill, and Gap. My friends think it's hilarious that I won't spend over $10.00 on a shirt but they're amazed at how much money I save them when we shop together!
One of the parents admit that he knows that his son is using drugs. He said, (my son) is a social user but not an addict. It’s no big deal.
(Paulo Sergio Valle, Osmar Milito, Marcos Valle)
The city released its GPS raw data in the last week of March, shortly after launching its My Transit-OC Transpo mobile application for Apple.
MAKE IT
I feel really good about what I've done so far, by the way! The house is a disaster, but I'm really enjoying all the work I've been doing and I can imagine a time in the not so distant future when I'll know exactly what lies within these four walls and where to find it. Plus, I've realized that my leisure time is much more enjoyable when I feel I've accomplished something toward my goals first. I haven't posted anything over there yet, but when I do (probably later today or tomorrow morning) I'll be sure to let you know and provide a link.
I didn't mean to cut you all out. Seriously, life just took over for the holidays and the EVERYTHING.
2 ½ tbsp White wine vinegar
Heathcliff ... Andrés Bertz
However, earlier this month it all changed. Israel’s deputy foreign minister Danny Ayalon held a long overdue conference in Jerusalem to launch his ministry's report and recommendations for highlighting the issue of these Jewish refugees driven out of Arab countries.
His blazing springs
“She figured getting baptized would be the best way start this new chapter in her life. It’s a new beginning.”
I’m no math wiz but that tells me any marketing budget should align relatively close to those numbers, doncha think?
lives are filled with indecisions
When does it arise?
I suppose it's because my son is fourteen - at least for another few weeks - and its a period in my life that I remember quite well, in parts.
So, the first thing the fossil record taught us was the reality of extinction, it also taught us that our planet has experienced some very different climates and ecosystems to those we see today. In my last article I mentioned the best wrong theory in history but what might take the wooden spoon of humiliation as the worst? Flood geology; the idea that the biblical flood of Noah’s ark fame explains all of modern geology. Strictly speaking it’s not a theory at all but a doctrine and one that is so laughable and self-evidently untrue it barely warrants refutation. The distribution of fossils in geological strata is not random but ordered, corresponding entirely with evolutionary theory and is therefore predictable. This is why evolutionary scientists are employed by oil companies; the search for oil is no longer a case of digging about the place and hoping for the best. A proper understanding of geology has also explained why earthquakes and tsunamis happen and can therefore say where and when they are most likely. Critics of science often believe that it’s all mostly untestable guesswork; if your point of view is wrong results will be correspondingly wrong. The truth is that different theories make different predictions and evidence establishes which theories to reject.
House series finale episode titled, Everyone Dies.
It was a fun morning and an excellent way to welcome the Christmas season! I can’t begin to explain how much I love this time of year and what a joy it is to experience the magic of the holiday season through my children’s eyes.
When it comes to a wedding dress, we may think of a strapless wedding dress in our mind. In fact, wedding dresses come in different charming necklines in the bridal fashion field. Among them, the one shoulder wedding dresses are very popular. Known as a asymmetrical, the dress looks very different in the neckline cut. A one shoulder wedding dress can look totally gorgeous with no embellishments along the neckline to make it look clean. This is kind of suitable for those girls who want to make a goddess bridal look. Or you can add some decoration to the wedding dress make it more glamorous if you are looking for a fashionable and luxurious bridal look. Goddess look wedding dresses are here to describe the one shoulder wedding dresses. Being timeless classic and elegant, you will find that you are so beautiful dressed in a wedding dress like that.
The sandals are a new Madewell purchase, the Crisscross Boardwalk Sandal. I took a size 9 (they only have half sizes). I really like the look and found them to be very comfortable for walking. The ankle strap is a bit of a bugger, but only because I am not of fan of bending over and fiddling with buckles and such. But the sandals are worth the extra effort.
T & A ( and the boys)
He is tender hearted and sensitive and persistent and a little stubborn.
If we are smart we will draw on your advice to strategise the way we will steer and strengthen the future of midwifery.
driving off the road and bumping into doors
So here's the contest part:
I don't remember very much about the evening, but I remember it.
In mermaid lore, they always seem to be a carefree sort of being, with few responsibilities or worries. They spend their days frolicking with their sealife friends and brushing their hair. When we're overwhelmed by errands and bills and play dates and deadlines and day jobs and planning dinner and who knows what else, it's easy to be envious of the beautiful, lithe creature whose greatest dilemma is whether to swim with dolphins or lure humans into the water.
The Compleat Pet Owner
was not boring--it was peace."
“You? Her? No dice, fat boy.” –Pinckney Benedict
I went to college in Texas, but I never really appreciated it until I moved to Massachusetts to attend law school. I then became an evangelist for all things Texan -- much to the amusement of my law-school friends, many of whom had never been west of the Hudson River. You couldn't find decent Tex-Mex food within 500 miles of Harvard Square, but at least I could listen to Mendocino in my cold, spartan dorm room.
While growing older poses new challenges and opportunities for all individuals, Holocaust survivors suffer additional complications during the aging process including experiencing feelings of loss of control and reliving painful memories. Since 2000, Holocaust Community Services, a collaborative effort of JCFS, CJE SeniorLife and the Jewish Federation of Metropolitan Chicago, in partnership with HIAS Chicago, has provided supportive services to the Chicago Holocaust survivor community and their families.
Your book's appendix of purported remedies is disheartening. Everything appears useless. Were you surprised at how few things have been proven to work?
it's about the One who came to save us. Give us life. not just life forever, but life on earth. That in the midst of game changers, He is constant, and he is with me and he is unshakeable.
4th Edition is streamlined and dynamic, it’s easier to play and keep on playing in to the wee hours of the morning.
“Finger’s crossed for a perfect week. It is getting easier though, they used to make them a lot tougher.”
So the big guy takes over and decides that Ed is to go to the VA Hospital. Ed and I worked out a plan whereby he would go to a regular hospital because he recited multiple poor experiences at the VA, but the Rural Metro jerk is determined to take over. The jerk makes it all about him, not about the patient. Ed has a carton with the VA Hospital’s return address on it and, based on nothing more than that, the RM Para-jerk decides Ed should go to the VA. If Ed had a bag from McDonald’s, would the RM jerk have insisted on taking him there? Just because you’ve been someplace doesn’t mean you want to go back there.
What to expect: You won’t look at your lamps the same way again. And your kid might want one.
'Let's just put it in the bin,' I suggested.
Members of Community Board 6 's Permits and Licenses Committee voted to deny a sidewalk café license for Buschenschank, the pseudo-Tyrolian beer pub at 320 Court Street at a meeting held at the Prospect Park YMCA last night. The establishment had requested a permit for an additional 18 tables and 48 chairs for the outside area.
His vision is to scale up the Akshaya Patra Program by 2020 to feed five million underprivileged children in India. www.akshayapatra.org
This is a size I dont usually do, but I thought I would have a try.. I made the layout that size, and just put it on a 12 by 12 paper so I could put it in the album I have..
Nintendo is staunchly against putting its games into the mobile sphere, but that doesn’t mean it might not be considering a jump of some kind into the ever-widening world of Android.
The top three from challenge 24 which was 'All Of A Flutter' are:
“The normal question- the first question- is always, are these cannibals? No, they are not cannibals. Cannibalism in the true sense of the word implies an intrapecies activity. These creatures cannot be considered human. They prey on humans. They do not prey on each other – that’s the difference.”
Sign Up By April 10th
Perfect for the Vampy woman
Kukl recorded two albums for Crass' record label, but rather than anarcho-punk, the band were on a kind of pagan magick primitivist trip (Kukl translates as 'sorcery'), achieving an intensity Björk compares to The Birthday Party and Einsturzende Neubauten. "Einar would wrap the mike cord around his neck and pull it until he fainted. Jump into the crowd and get bones broken. I still meet people who say Kukl was like a religious experience. Either that, or the worst thing they ever saw."
Congress affirms that the authority of the President to use all necessary and appropriate force…includes the authority for the Armed Forces of the United States to detain covered persons (as defined in subsection (b)) pending disposition under the law of war.
I also decided to give this one some dimension to go with that fabulous texture by mounting the embossed panel and the frames all with foam tape! *LOVE!* Seriously, though, you guys...this is one of those cards that I had spinning in my head for a few days...it evolved through a few different design ideas and then when I finally saw it in real live paper...I was in love! HA! I love it when that happens!!!
What a strange journey to preservation the Austin, Nichols & Company warehouse in Williamsburg has taken. As per today's NYT City section:
That's becoming my recurring theme for 2012: How Things Are. It's why I'm here (writing this blog on this topic, not in the larger, universal/existential kind of way, which a subject for an entirely different blog, I'm sure). Historically (or, How Things Were) I have tended to be hyperfocused on past wrongs or future assumptions. It's been easy to still be pissed about something that happened years ago. Or to be so wrapped up in some future event (ever planned a wedding? most boring day ever is the first day back at work AFTER the wedding) that it becomes all you see.
In 1981 K.Harvey Proctor(c) announced the Conservative party Monday Club's official policy - to repatriate 50,000 immigrants a year. The forward to the document was by Sir Ronald Bell.
Most leaders I speak with will launch right into “who are you?” with definitive statements of their accomplishments at work, that they are a husband, a mother, a business owner, an executive.. Those things are great BUT those are things they have done, not who they are. One of the lessons I learned in business coaching was about the distinction between who you are and what you do. Your accomplishments (or doing) will always flow out of your being, WHO YOU ARE. When it comes to the second question, most people I talk to have not figured that one out yet. So let’s take a look …
We have an infestation.
Best Foreign Language Film
“I see you’re a legal expert,” said the Welshman. “I’ve got a friend who could use your advice. I’ll write down his email address and a website where the details of his case are available.”
Letter F
-- The World Trade Center begins construction. I'll be very surprised if some mention isn't made of the envious offices with their magnificent views.
Duncan Jepson, the author of All the Flowers in Shanghai, tells an interesting story of Feng, a young Chinese woman forced into an arranged marriage in the years before the country was invaded by the Japanese. The story reads as an explanation from a much older Feng to her estranged daughter. The opening chapters are intriguing and the reader experiences the very real impending doom that seems so much worse since the innocent and young Feng is naive to her future.
And actually, I'm going to give today's platform to them, because they interviewed me and the gist of it is over on the Cat's Rrar blog. So, all I'll do is thank them very much and also publish Douglas's incredibly perceptive and well-written review. You'll be amazed that he's only 16.
It was ugly. I’m not going to go into more detail than that (mostly because I just pictured my mom reading this and how uncomfortable Thanksgiving will be this year for him if I don’t shut up). I left as soon as I could, and not one day went by where I wasn’t just heartsick and lost. But at least I was moving forward instead of stuck in that horrible limbo of uncertainty. During that time, if you’d told me that in a year I would view what came out of that mess as a blessing … honestly, I probably would have punched you. But it really is true, and here’s why:
OK, focus now, because I’m only going to write this once.
I'm almost as old
By the end of the year, Microsoft and its partners will have sold about 4.9 million tablets to mainly enterprise users, giving it a 4.1 percent market share.
Television - Marquee Moon (expanded) - 1977
we know now we won’t go
I think we can all agree that last night’s dialogue session on our “zero-tolerance” policy regarding meat products was beneficial. Remember, if it had a parent, we won’t eat it! Even though I’d love to eat up your adorable children! (Ha, Ha).
World War II continues to provide the background for novels today and Honor Knows No Borders by John Sharer (iUniverse, softcover) asks a philosophical question of about enemies in war. A dangerous and often fatal pursuit, collecting pieces of bombs is a prime activity for boys in London during WWII in the early 1940s. Young Tom Sloan is no exception. While investigating one ravaged building, he finds more than he expects, an injured German pilot, Hauptman Heinrich Leuzinger, who had ejected from his plane. Leuzinger begs Tom not to turn him in to authorities, but rather to help him see his wife and children again. Tom understands this is a dangerous dilemma for which there could be serious consequences. More than a thousand miles away in the North African desert, the boy's father, Major Bernie Sloan, a British officer and the commandant of a German and Italian POW camp, meets captured German Colonel Hans Dieter Reichmann who tells an unbelievable story. Sloan, a Jew, harbors a deep hatred for Germany and its people. Sloan finds it difficult to believe that Reichmann may have actually saved a Jewish family by smuggling them out of Germany. Both father and son are about to discover that in war, as in life, things are not always as they appear, and people can't always be judged by the uniforms they wear. Rising Tides – Destroyermen: Book Five by Taylor Anderson ($25.95, New American Library) adds a parallel universe to a World War II drama, billed as an “alternative history” series. Apparently military science fiction is a new and popular genre. In this case it involves Lt. Commander Matthew Reddy and the crew of the U.S.S. Walker. As you might imagine, the first four novels in the series did quite well. This one is filled with drama and adventure, plus the extra element of a non-human species that gets involved in the conflict on the high seas.
1 1/2 tsp pepper
At the moment, my Mother is living with this sister, my Aunt. Mom sold her house recently and has bought a new place, but it's being 'brought up to standard' as she likes to say to her friends. So while the works are being carried out, she's shacking up with her big sis.
Irregular working hours: slight increase in risk of spontaneous abortion (Axelsson et al., 1989)
The results?
This is one of the two early chaos spawn, both of which had boobies. The first spawn ever? Maybe, but I would give a suspicious Waitsian carney squint at the three legged crab mutant from Asgard as a possible first. Answers on a postcard to....
The other list that's growing is the things I need to pay for. Trying to fit Christmas in the midst of all the wedding payments is a bit difficult this year to say the least. But, Gzilla and I decided to set a limit on our gifts, and then we'll save up to go to a fancy dinner in Philly. We'll probably go back to 10Arts and have Jen Carroll from Top Chef make us dinner again. That place was amazing...
- Neostrata facial cleanser: 25% off
10/3 - St. Louis, MO - Pop's
We do not need to be told by our parents that it is fundamentally wrong to tell untruths, however harmless, or even desirable, the consequences may seem to be. We ‘know’ it – instinctively. That is the theme of another one of my stories – The Lie. The same is true of our ‘knowledge’ that right is on the side of the small and courageous holding fast against the large and tyrannical. In my story, Vijaya, the brave little rabbit is David and the elephant is Goliath.
I'm sorry but I have to say...
Sometimes we do have an “other” box which is usually for things that need to be returned to someone, or need to go to a different room of the house.
I need to start by apologizing. My sincerest apologies for looking like a terrified deer-in-headlights when you jogged towards me the other night. I don't believe that an apology that blames the other person is a true apology, but in this case, I'm going to totally blame you and hope that it still counts as an apology of sorts.
How secure is that God-given life? It is as secure as the giver. The sequence is outlined in Ephesians 1:13.
Then, as I began to see, I didn’t want to see. I didn’t want it to be this way. I didn’t want to face reality. I still struggle with that to some degree.
So here's my argument against this so called "scientific study." Because I listen to songs repetitively yet finitely, those particular songs become a part of my living history. They denote a place in time, a feeling, a person, a series of events that occurred during the time in which a particular song served as soundtrack.
Dad thought for a moment. “Leopard tamers,” he said, with a dramatic, round-eyed flourish.
Well, again, I thought maybe I would wear Brandin down by applying again, lol!!! But I'm sure the amount of submissions was overwhelming and she chose some really talented scrappers. I will be looking forward to seeing all the beautiful work in the coming year! Congrats ladies!!!
The first two pieces are Steampunk, a necklace and a broach. Both have watch parts, a cameo and part of an old bracelet. The broach is backed with part of a doily that has been stiffened with gel medium and the necklace is backed with an old poker chip.
Highlights – Several quick submissions. A quick knockout (Erin Beach lost after Sam Sicilia popped him on the chin and knocked him out, in 8 seconds of the first round. All that training and he doesn’t get through 10 seconds). Something we shall refer to as the “northbound toe”. One fighter broke his toe to the extent that it was pointing up towards his head. He had a quick look, then sucked it up and carried on. Sadly with his mobility limited he lost the fight.
These independent members of parliament will be the TRUE WAKIL RAKYAT since they will not be bound by any party rules.
Zaatar is the spice mix which really makes this dish. We wanted a Mediterranean, Middle-Eastern flavor to this vegetable kugel to compliment our Ashkenaze-focused meal. This particular Zaatar spice mix is a Jordanian blend, but there are many other types of Zaatar blends you can buy in Middle Eastern markets of different ethnicities.
Amazingly, a few weeks later, Griffin found himself on a C-130 transport plane from Kuwait to Baghdad. He would join Skip's unit in the 2-3 Stryker Brigade, at a base near the Baghdad airport.
There are three basic stories told to us in these five chapters. All three are introduced by the expression, “In those days Israel had no king.” All three show in broader and broader brush stoke just how depraved things got because: first, Israel had no central authority and second, everyone did as they saw fit.
This follows up on my 9/1/05 report, "The New York Times and Forest City Ratner's Atlantic Yards: High-Rises and Low Standards: A Pattern of Inadequate, Misleading, Mostly Uncritical Coverage." The report (link below) analyzes Times coverage of the proposed $3.5 billion project, the largest ever in Brooklyn, to build a basketball arena plus at least 16 high-rise buildings. Here I analyze further coverage of the project and also provide my own reporting.
They must have girls running the show over there.
- Hair was still only under 2 inches long and hated it, BUT +, Zelda and I flew to Pasadena, CA to see Dr Tawansy. Her retinas have remained attached! Creed and Evan took a road trip to El Paso.
What I say to end the conversation: Yup. I am certainly young.
update; lucky again the part is only $175! Woo Hoo!
On the agenda over the weekend is a much-anticipated remote beach cleanup. We have rented a boat for the day and will take a group of local kids along to tidy up the beach and surf a few waves to cool off!
of his chest,
So what you’re right about, I think, is, is that the leaders in the room here at a certain point have to step up and do the right thing, regardless of the voices in our respective parties that are trying to undermine that effort.
A significant change from years past has been the packaging. The standard pallet contains 170 cases but customers such as Sam’s, Costco’s and other club stores, ask for and get different numbers of cans under the shrink wrap.
Every home needs a few living things in it...other than people, of course. Pets count and are essential (at least to me), but they don't exactly contribute to the decor plan. Plants and flowers do contribute and can be used to bring some color, texture, and life to pretty much any room. They make for a quick, easy, and inexpensive accessory. I'm a big fan of fiddle leaf fig trees, succulents, and orchids because they all look good, last longer than cut flowers, and are really easy to care for. Here are a couple of examples:
Next we have one of my current favorite performers Cody Rhodes defending HIS Intercontinental Championship against the largest athlete in the world, The Big Show. Cody has been 1 upping the Big Show for weeks now.
Our Italian gardener friend Louie said it would be alright to put the tomato
(A lot more shit happened, so I'll post the other half later this week!)
1.) Jude begging to play baseball 2.) my random sweet-n-low packet laying around the kitchen 3.) " bun-bun" all dressed up 4.) the never ending bottles needing to be washed 5.) Hutch ... I didn't include Harvey...didn't think he was to missed
Last week I was describing letting go of carrying hatred and rage toward a person who has wronged you by viewing them in terms of who they are. If one can see where someone else is coming from, how it is they came to wrong you, it tends to be a lot easier to let go of the pain they have saddled you with, because, odds are they were saddled with a sort of pain that was probably pretty unfair to begin with. And I talked a bit about my own efforts in forgiving someone who has a great deal of trouble not acting selfishly. I wrote that while at this point in time I’m learning not to carry animosity forward, the first step being to see how much pain that person is in, I also value myself enough not to stick myself in the path of his actions. And I’m disinclined in this moment to physically interact with that person because that person hasn’t learned to deal with his pain in a healthy manor yet, despite forgiving him his actions for my own sake. And if I were to forgive in terms of putting behind me his actions so as to continue a relationship forward, Dr. Laura’s advice below would then become more or less exactly what I would be looking for in order to feel like that person has matured past the problem unfortunately created within him to begin with.
This year, Bailey is celebrating Beltane by giving away a copy of Brownies and Broomsticks. Just leave a comment to enter. For more information about her or either of her mystery series, please check out her website at www.cricketmcrae.com , or either of her blogs at www.hearthcricket.com or www.baileycates.com.
and take a look at them. By now.
I realize it doesn't bother most people, apparently, but then I am a purist when it comes to these things. I like each thing to be distinct and true to itself. I don't like blends and adulterations. But that's just me.
For weeks on end – no, wait…months, actually – all I’ve heard from my darling husband is: “All I want is to get some, barreling lefts… just a nice, clean, hollow left.” This statement is almost always accompanied with him posing in a front-side stance, along with sound effects of what it’s supposed to sound like when you get barreled.
I use DCP and ofcorse the stamp is Milton & Co.
Orange County, California – Two Brothers Racing has unleashed hidden horsepower and torque in the 2012 Yamaha FZ6R with its V.A.L.E. 4-­‐2-­‐1 Complete Exhaust System. Simply replacing the restrictive stock exhaust system with this Absolute Top LevelTM full system gave the FZ6R an additional 5.3 horsepower at 9400 RPM and a peak increase of 3.8 horsepower. Additionally the torque has been bumped up 4.2 ft-­‐lbs in the midrange, while producing 2.8 ft-­‐lbs at the peak of the torque curve.
He had a very distinct vision of cupcakes that he would make.. It would be like an Ocean.. with a shark.. eating a smaller fish....
“It must be that there is something naturally absurd in a sincere emotion, though why there should be I cannot imagine, unless it is that man, the ephemeral inhabitant of an insignificant planet, with all his pain and all his striving is but a jest in an eternal mind. ”
Somehow the thought process led to a place where lullabies were slipping out of me… they are sad, a bit, and nostalgic, and this is one of them -
"If Scots really want independence for political and cultural reasons, they should go for it. But if they vote for independence they should do so in the knowledge that their country could end up as one of Europe's vulnerable, marginal economies. In the 18th century, Edinburgh's fine architecture and its Enlightenment role earned it the nickname Athens of the North. It would be a shame if that name became apt again for less positive reasons."
I was doing a paper on Social Networking and it blocked MySpace because it’s a “single’s service,” or some such bullshit as that. So today, I get an essay back from my teacher and decide to post it to my other blog. I type in wordpress.com into the address bar and what do you think pops up? That’s right, people.
“Well, given the context, I’d say I’m out of vegetables.”
When people are bored they do strange things.
I have been outside more since all the rain has eased up. Most of April and May we had lots and lots of rain. I planted my very first herb garden
"But wait!" you say, "I thought getting foreclosed on was a bad thing!"
Firstly I would like to say a big thank you to all of you that have left such lovely comments on my first post - I feel truly welcomed into the fold.....
I love the how this magazine is geared towards coloring; it is a great place to find tutorials, tips, and color combos. Plus it is just eye candy as there are so many awesome creations. Oh and the best part is that it is FREE!
My biggest complaint is the lack of women showcased in the film. Four out the five ‘main’ individuals highlighted were men, and I don’t know why Spurlock couldn’t have made sure to create a good balance between genders. Men and women both attend Comic-Con, and women were virtually not present throughout the whole movie. Only a few of the celebrities interviewed were women, and when you’ve got Kevin Smith going on about ‘hot chicks at the convention’ at the end of the film, it makes you wonder why Spurlock couldn’t have interviewed some of those supposedly ‘hot chicks’. I know there’s a lack of influential women in ‘geek culture’ (compared to men) but that doesn’t mean there are none.
“Hold on there” Evan interjected “it’s not Helen’s fault that you and Donna-”
Kegged: 02-16-2008
I fixed the link to like "In A Pikle" on Facebook. Sorry about that!
Happy Birthday to my gorgeous boy! My wish for you is to NEVER loose that spark!
Strap with 22cm drop.
There’s so much anger swirling around inside Carley that she can’t let herself get close to her foster family, the Murphy’s. And yet, she finds herself watching this loving family, struggling to understand their unconditional love, and longing to be part of their family.
This time,
Updates from this past weekend:
(Back Row) Coach Dan Fehr (so cute!!), Nicole Rempel, Pauline McKONE, Kristina Siggelkow, Lindsay Holm, Moi, Assistant Coach Paul Gudlaugsen
threat of blizzard, slicked down highway,
The Lord bless you from Zion,
I had trained hard for Madrid. I knew that going sub-4 would be tough and 2 weeks ago, had completely written it off. During taper, I gave myself the confidence I needed to be able to enjoy that last 10k. I told myself that I would run sub-4 in Madrid. I didn't give myself any alternatives. I really, truly believed that I could run my best marathon in Madrid. If I hadn't let myself think that, I would have walked off the course the second I saw my second 12:xx mile on my Garmin. But I kept going. I pulled myself together and started really pushing at Mile 25. I worked hard for Madrid and I wasn't about to let Madrid be my worst race.
Once again: when white, Afrikaans students play a prank in which nobody is physically harmed, it is “racism” and it reaches the front pages of the international press.
he reveals his promiscuous need
We have spent upwards of 1 billion dollars in Libya, though that’s not what’s gotten politicians from both sides of the aisle riled up. President Obama, who campaigned on the rule of law, and portrayed himself as the anti-Bush, the candidate who would respect Congressional authority and reign in the Executive branch, never sought Congressional approval for military action in Libya.
piles up at the bottom of things.
Alpha Star Burger was winning me and the meat wasn't even off the grill. Pictures tell the story of the burger best from here:
I will give the film two kudos. One, the special effects were good. The Hulk bears an uncanny resemblance to Eric Bana, which is a nice touch. You might even thik the special effect sequences are worth seeing the movie for. Be my guest, but brace yourself for what the movie is really about. The other kudo goes to Nick Nolte for playing the abusive Brian Banner. He is an unappealing character, but Nolte plays him to the hilt.
Papers: DCWV Rustic Stack
Lifespan: 6 months
So so close to finishing this sucker! Go go go!!!! I want to start another Sampler Girl one.
We here at the fan blog wish to welcome Mr. McDonough to the production, and look forward to his portrayal of “Fighting Joe” Hooker!
I love to read and I’ve recently been delving into a lot of books on Spirituality from the ‘Law of Attraction’ to ‘Ask and it is Given’ by
I then dealt with the insurance company directly, got them whatever they needed and kept getting stalled about the cheque. Finally I just lost it, told them I can’t do business without that money, that I’d make it my full time job to show up to their offices and call every TV station I could think of to cover this story if I didn’t get my cheque! They seemed pretty alarmed.
Please know that your comments are valued and they will be shared with our Grocery Merchandising Team so they are aware of the interest for this J&D Popcorn item.
It was going to be a natural tie-in. A photo essay of the typical chores I tackle on a Sunday, even a Sunday that’s part of the Labor Day holiday weekend.
Impression: My favorite songs on the album are “No Reflection“, “Slo-Mo-Tion“, “Breaking The Same Old Ground“, and the title track “Born Villain“. The only song I really dislike is “Pistol Whipped“. This isn’t the best album ever from Marilyn Manson, but it is the best we’ve seen in a few releases and it is much more personal lyrically than previous releases. As I listen to multiple listens I seem to feel differently about the album at each listen, but the end verdict is it is a worthwhile collection of songs. You may be able to tell from reading my review that I ran the gambit of emotions regarding this album, and I think from the interviews I’ve read this is what Marilyn Manson has intended. If so, then great job on his part.
Don’t leave this hitchhiker to go insane
80+
I have, now, what has to be THE best romantic fiction reading list ever devised by woman. I’m going to be reading my way through it this year, exploring genres I don’t often dip into, discovering new authors, and new books by old familiar friends.
The young ballplayer grew up in Crown Heights, lived on Eastern Parkway and went to PS9 among other schools.
I have been looking online, but can't seem to find anywhere that does card at a decent price!
Thirdly, people become open-mined and the culture differences narrow down. The development of technology and informatization is rapid, the culture, custom and traditions are propagated and spreaded to every corner of the world via movies, music and other medium and become known to more people. Therefore, marriage with foreigners become much more acceptable rather than the strange.On such a condition, internet dating service grows up. This dating method is believed to be the best and the most effective way to meet a guy outside the Asian countries.
- North Turramurra
Joseph Estrella16 days ago
A lot of excellent work on patent litigation was done by the late American economist Jenny Lanjouw and her co-authors. With British-based economist Mark Shankerman, Lanjouw finds that 95% of patent suits settle before trial. Litigated patents are more valuable than non-litigated patents. Where competitors have patents citing a particular firm’s patent, that firm is more likely to litigate to build reputation. They also argue that small firms are disadvantaged in patent litigation. Larger firms tend to have larger patent portfolios and more resources which improves their bargaining position and the likelihood of cross-licensing. Larger firms are more likely to repeatedly interact with other IPR holders in their sector, which again creates an environment more suited to out of court resolutions.
Here are the raws: leg of lamb, EVOO, S&P, dried oregano (fresh would have been better), grainy Dijon mustard, fresh rosemary, 4 cloves of garlic, 1 shallot and even though I show 1.5 lemons, I used the juice of 2.5… it didn’t seem lemony enough at first.
Roll out thawed crust into pie dish. Place half of your chicken in bottom of dish, top with half your veggies and 1 can cream soup. Layer remaining ingredients. Top with additional pie crust (you can do fancy lattice work or simply lay rolled out dough over pie) and crimp the edges to seal in filling. Be sure to make vent holes in your crust if you roll out your top crust. Brush with melted butter or egg wash (optional). Bake on cookie sheet in a preheated 425 degree oven for 60-75 mins.
fresh squeezed orange juice ),
Local food is about the future.
This is the place where Tunga river and Bhadra river Combines to form Tungabhadra river.
been a lot of wonderful inspiration lately... thanks for that!
I LOOOVE GREEN! :)
If you love a historical mystery, you will enjoy Midnight in Peking, subtitled “How the murder of a young Englishwoman haunted the last days of old China” by Paul French ($26.00, Penguin original). It is a true crime story about the murder of a British school girl, Pamala Werner, found at the base of the Fox Tower. With the Japanese already in Manchuria and encircling Peking, an investigation by a former Scotland Yard officer takes him deep into Peking’s seedy underworld of crime, drugs, and prostitution. Her father’s life is consumed with his own investigation. The author provides the resolution and transforms a front page murder into an absorbing and emotional expose.
Another Norvell Page-penned Spider pulp packed with gat-blasting mayhem. A demented senator is the pawn of a sinister puppetmaster who soon (in an obvious metaphor for Hitler) has criminal stormtroopers filling the streets of Washington D. C., burning alive their opposition and surrounding The White House, wanting to lynch the president. Against impossible odds and already wounded, The Spider takes on this menace to national security! Unbelievable, but it moves.
Of course, over time, the liver can get clogged up with bad stuff and make it not work as effectively, which is where the liver cleanse comes into play. There are several ways to do it - very quick, very short, long and drawn out, changing the diet, using pills, drinking juice, fasting - a google search reveals all the secrets. My preference is to use Perfect Cleanse by Garden of Life. It's a 10 day regime, used at night only, very gentle on my system, and worth the $25 I spend at Sprouts for the single-use program.
The bodies of the dead men were in a too badly damaged state to bring out and they were buried at the site under rocks. Later a family member had an obelisk erected on Mt Lindsay at Border Gate for James Westray, the survivor who tried to get help. You need to be a very fit, hardened bushwalker to reach these burial sites.
their laughter drifting on the wind.
My body lies covered in dust
I can’t,
Shades = adding black to the pure colour
Weird and seriously weird, appear to be the order of the day, these days. A few days ago, I noticed that Spring was here. That’s something I have always been able to sense. Several days later, it is obvious that Spring has arrived. It comes earlier in this part of Europe than most anywhere else, except the far south. This is only tangentially connected to my point; those change in seasons. It doesn’t matter that it is Spring. It could be any season. It is the change factor that is important.
4) Planning gatherings with like-minded folks
And if one wants to talk about a motion concerned with la vita nuda,
We were way early, so we stopped along the way for an espresso (watching al Jazeera on the shop's TV), walked down Hayes and looked at the shops, stopped in the Place Pigalle bar for another beer (I had a Deschutes Black Butte, Cathy got a Pilsner Urquell that I helped finish), and then walked back up the street to Suppenküche. On the way, John Hansell called: he was bored, Amy was getting a massage, and where was it we were meeting for a beer? Come on down, I told him, I'll hold a lager for you.
We eat alot of pasta around here. Seems like every time it’s on sale at Meijers (10 for $10), we buy a bunch, and we are always running low by the next sale. I get bored of plain pasta and sauce, so I’m always on the prowl for new recipes. Today I tried out a recipe from my Pinterest board called Spinach & Artichoke Baked Pasta.
4 May, 2012 – A man, sentenced to be executed, fighting his sentence, fighting for his life, is to be baptized, confirmed, and to receive his first communion as a full member of the Catholic Church. Death Row, Tennessee.
The only way towards a single system may now be for the Court of Justice itself to decide on patent litigation cases – something which the profession does not want.
A heavy heart flows to the sea.
BOBBY GARRETT - MY LITTLE GIRL
The U.S. has been actively seeking the overthrow of the Iranian regime since their ascent to power in the 1979 Islamic revolution. The U.S. pursued a policy of bait and bleed in the 80s, by funding Iraq during the Iran-Iraq war. The U.S. also secretly armed Iran, so that Iraq wouldn’t consolidate too much power in the region, in what is known as the Iran-Contra scandal. This was a secret and illegal covert operation, wherein Israel shipped arms to Iran, was then rearmed by the U.S., and the profits that were generated from the sale went to fund anti-revolutionary forces in Nicaragua, which Congress had barred the U.S. from funding. This war consisted of brutal trench warfare, and it is estimated that approximately half-a-million people perished. Saddam also used chemical weapons, both on Iranians and Iraqi Kurds.
Yes, everything is back into perspective. I am not too old to dream, not too old to do things that make me happy, not too old to live my dreams…I still have today.
I'd had enough. I excused myself from my dinner party, got up, walked over to his table, took his phone from his ear and told him I was going to shove that phone up his ass if he didn't take his conversation elsewhere.
8. Several years ago, Turkey chose a prime minister -- Erdogan -- from a conservative, somewhat religious party. That seemed to freak some people out at the time -- what would happen to the secularist tradition Ataturk had established? -- but now Turkey is more commonly viewed as a model for the region.
I will mourn her and miss her like mad,
Nevertheless, during the past month at Columbia Bible College, I was reassured with the teaching that God does in fact speak to us, and that we must be consistently and intellectually be aware of God’s various ways of responding to our prayers. Thus, we must recognize God’s message to us through our surrounding individuals, nature, and his other creations. More importantly, we will find God’s will and response to our circumstances through his Words in Scripture. Once again, it is confirmed for the Christians of today that it is essential for us to read the Bible. It is, therefore, not a mere “book of guidelines,” or solely “the book about Jesus and his miracles, and random stories like that of David.” It is, however, God’s story. And this story takes us into the history of God’s journey with His people, the Israelites, in the Old Testament. Here we see the consequences of the sinful nature of mankind, yet also the mercy and love of God that provide salvation to his people. In the New Testament, we discover God’s eternal blessing to us through our Saviour, Jesus Christ, who has saved us from our sins’ consequences in the past, present, and future tense. We are, God tells us, the newly elected to serve and evangelize to the world. As members of the Christian Church, we are the patriarchs that are to devote our lives into God’s hands and share the gospel with the world. Therefore, we must come to an understanding that our prayers are answered, yet we must be highly aware of our surrounding people and nature, as well as familiarize ourselves with God’s message and will for us present in the Bible.
Finished these paintings and framed them today, they look pretty nice. More dogs for the dog-painting portfolio- someday I'll figure out how to paint a black labrador in a way that doesn't look like an inky spot with ears.
Today, as I was listening to one of my favourite CBC Radio 1 shows, DNTO, I was inspired. Today’s episode was about letter writing, which, if you ask me is a lost art. Not too long ago, I suggested to a friend that we write letters back and forth. After sending off a few letters, with nothing in return, I was a bit discouraged. However, as I listened to the radio show this afternoon, I realized something: with the exception of one or two, the letters I wrote were really about introducing myself to this new friend.
I resolved to change my habits and to relearn hot to read, to go back to my love of book.
put down the pens.
Delas Frères Domaine Des Tourettes Hermitage 2009(91652, $69) will be the singularly most requested wine of mortal value from this catalogue. Robert Parker rated it (98). Drop me a line if your ticket comes in.
The doorbell chimed. Gunther rose and stretched his legs. He answered.
'cause we're crazy like that.
By KJ Mullins.
It is purple, turquoise and white/silver. And we put selfmad cookies on it.
We knew pretty much how the song was going to end right from the start, the tricky part was building the progression of craziness leading up to that point. It was a challenge, but led to some fun conversations about exactly what we could have this guy do to a mannequin without crossing the proverbial line. If such a line exists in a song like this.
Thank you Ali Edwards for changing my perspective when it comes to New Year's Resolutions. One Little Word is the way to go for me. I love embracing a single word... a word that will shape me, define me, challenge me, lead me, reach for me, push me, pull me and allow me to be ... well, more.
“But the natural man receiveth not the things of the Spirit of God; for they are foolishness unto him; neither can he know them because they are spiritually discerned.”
I love that damn squirrel…ahem.
Colson Whitehead’s first piece of professional writing, for the Village Voice, was a think piece about the series finales of Who’s The Boss and Growing Pains.
They aren’t doing this for art, for the author, or for the reader – to think otherwise is quite naïve. Google are doing this for themselves.
Pointed my way
And while my peeps think that there is hope and I’ll hear from him soon, I have to trust my gut even when it hurts and realize, sometimes these questions may be left unanswered and will forever lie around in several shades of gray.
The first is titled Coptic/Copic; I'll teach how to bind a coptic journal and then we'll use it for art journaling. I'll be teaching some unique copic mixed-media techniques that I've developed over the last year. I'm proud to say that since these techniques are my own unique creations, I'm the only one who knows how to do them! Some of the techniques include bleach masking photographs and colorizing images before transferring them.
I decided this week's Sentimental Sunday would be of me and my sister, Emily, pregnant together. These photos were taken in October 2006. Emily was a couple of weeks away from giving birth to my niece, Ella (her first child). I was about a month and a half away from giving birth to Grant (my third child).
c) Lots of gluten upsets my tummy. I've cut my gluten consumption probably to more than half of what it used to be (I was all gluten, all the time for a while...pasta, bagels and toast, oh my!), but I've got a sensitivity, and when you combine the aforementioned cupcake-grabbin' with other gluten-y things, my digestive system gets all backed up and I get stomach cramps and bloating (OMG TMI WHAT WHAT you know you love it when I over-share).
As for resting today, it rained all day, which turned both children into screaming monkeys. Literally. Her Majesty has discovered that if she YELLS REALLY LOUD, she can make our house echo. (And this girl has obviously inherited her opera singing grandmother's voice). So she did that a lot. And she has learned how to remove her diaper, and outside clothing if need be. W.B. wanted to play with all of his new toys at the same time. I had laundry to do, disgusting bathrooms to clean, and a week's worth of shit to put away. Pod and I just wanted to nap. It was a long day.
At-Home Weigh-In
I should probably post something related to partying or Birthdays or celebrating in general as a Closer............Nope. Dexys Midnight Runners; GO!
Check'em out! Here's "Girl," followed by "Numbers."
With this short and the Game of Thrones commercial, this SNL episode made it clear that nudity is now de rigueur in comedy. This sort of faux backstage encounter is bread-and-butter for the digital shorts, and Gotye’s laid-back persona worked well for bouncing off of. B+
Abracadabra, a word used by magicians as a mystical word to invoke spirits, has origin in the Aramaic phrase, avda kedavra, meaning "what was said, has been done." For those of you Potter fans, J.K. Rowling was influenced by this for her Avada Kedavra curse.
Q: What was your inspiration for the Dancing Zombie?
Geez, I would totally understand if you told me straight up that I pushed the wrong buttons or I stepped on some nerves because I honestly don’t get where and in what way I have wronged you. I’m certain though that it’s unintentional and I’m totally unaware of it cos in my part, I wouldn’t consciously do anything to attack you. I’d take a bullet first before I do that. Srsly.
This is how they look when I blend them together. I think that with this year I shall also use them separately as so many folk asked for plain bright colours.
Patterned: SU
Because it had a stairway that was perfect for playing 'Troll Under the Bridge'.
Do you feel me now
25 In the twelfth year of Joram the son of Ahab king of Israel did Ahaziah the son of Jehoram king of Judah begin to reign.
Myspace
Copy Paper 8 from the kit, Paste as a new layer, Image, Resize by 80%
history, these three men have invited us to go with them.
psst! Just wanted to wish my lovely Jamie a happy 12 year anniversary (of when we began 'dating'... not marriage. We didn't get married when we were 14) :-)
I did my research, and then I set out to do everything meticulously, carefully, so that I wouldn't miss anything or do anything to mess myself up. The egg whites were nice and old. My almonds had been ground with my powdered sugar, sifted to remove any larger pieces of nut, and then weighed and measured right up to the gram. I set up a pastry bag with a small round tip, took a deep breath, and began to whip my whites.
We head first to Vickys Bed and Breakfast. She tells us the story of her upstart which started as a small section of her house and is currently a multi-room, two story place to greet visitors from all over the world. Vicky discusses some of the hard ships of being a women running a business, but has obviously made a success of it. She also recounts the holiday parties that she plans for the community where each child gets a pencil or pen as a gift. We donate some rand and head downstairs to play with some neighborhood kids. We are stormed once more by children aching for stickers and once again we distribute them with smiles. Some kids were content with just one, while others seemed to keep running through the line. We try to be as fair as we can as older members of the community try to keep the kids in a line. Everyone gathers back on the bus where we discuss the idea of this form of tourism. Our guide Jimmyexplains that although Townships were No-Goareas during apartheid, the community really wants foreigners to see their hardships so that there can be more public outcries. Seeing such poverty really did do a number on me, so it seems to be working.
"Taught wisdom by disaster,
Hard to believe it, but in a few weeks, the first decade of the 21st century draws to a close.
1 oz. Willamette (5% AA, 30 min.) Flowers
I will be late to my own funeral. It's inevitable.
This message has two parts.
Did y’all know there was another scale to measures earthquakes. There’s the new thing I’ve learned for today. Yeah, me!
Well: maybe.
I will post later on this week about my other projects. I finished a RAK, and a bunch of other things this weekend!!! Can't wait to show you my work!!
Unlike what I am posting here today some of Ross' best work was done in color and can be found in such works as The Pickwick Papers (Heritage Club, 1938), The Sketch Book of Geoffrey Crayon, Gent (Heritage Press, 1939), and The Sir Roger de Coverly Papers (Limited Edition Club, 1945). Also you can find his work in The Children's Munchausen (Houghton Mifflin, 1921), and a color DJ for Pony Jungle (Doubleday Doran, 1941), a children's book by Lavinia Davis.
He flicked the saliva-covered and motionless Nibbles back into the victim's hand.
In 2010, the Social Security Administration awarded benefits in 63.4% of its initial decisions in Puerto Rico, compared with much lower rates elsewhere. In Arizona, for example, benefits were awarded in initial applications in 35.6% of the cases. Nine of the 10 top U.S. zip codes for workers collecting Social Security disability benefits are in Puerto Rico, according to government data.Somehow one rather doubts that the differences in rates of awards in disability applications reflect absolute levels of real disability. And people can to a great extent choose whether to apply for sick leave or not; illness is often not terribly objective, and the ill person can sometimes (often?) decide for himself whether or not he is able to work.
What caused the fire, The wind?
Before, I would have talked myself out of doing such a course because of my self-doubt, poor self-image, low self-confidence and chronic anxiety, plagued with worries over meeting new people, doing something different and stepping out of my comfort zone.
23 sure
I thought I’d share a little photo montage of what I’ve been up to the past few days in terms of working out.
"Praise the LORD, I tell myself;
Renovations.
How many of you out there have chosen to separate yourselves from one or both of your parents because of the way they treated you? That was the question I asked on Twitter. I was blown away by the responses. There were about 20 people who spoke up and shared a little of their stories with me, out of about 400 followers. I was surprised at how common this issue seemed to be. Then I asked a similar question on Facebook, this time asking people to email me their stories, not sure what I would do with them yet.
Wednesday 5/23
Accidents did happen as the cell phone and other communications did not exist. Swinging lanterns or red and green lights back and forth and waving flags were the means of communication between people and trains.
This is so unfortunate for the Obama’s, after all they are our first family and he is the first black/white President of the United States but I can’t stop thinking that this guy and his wife are not who they say they are. They don’t seem to uphold the integrity of our past first families, yes, even Richard Nixon for all you lefties out there.
8/9 Persistence
I'm not really exaggerating when I say that in the 1:17:00 runtime of this film, about 1:12:33 of it is ninjas training, ninjas kicking the shit out of people, and Murat kicking the shit out of ninjas. If you've ever seen a Turkish B-movie before, you pretty much know what to expect here, although I have to say this is possibly the most action packed one I have seen yet.
for the whole world is mine and all that is in it.
You see you don't have to have incredible wealth or ability or even a perfect heart to rescue one of these children. You don't have to have resources untold or even piles of compassion...you just need a heart to save
3. What fashion faux pas is most unforgiving. Be ruthless?
b. The Supreme Constitutional Court shall rule on the claim within 30 days of being entered in its register.
In the east garden, the strawberry bed, you can see several of the plants poking up through their winter cover. We have not taken the hay out yet because of all the rain but we shall have to do it soon. Perhaps next week won't be so soggy.
Another man killed about 6 people at a family court, including his ex-wife’s attorney. And still – women are vengeful and not to be believed. Sigh.
For the next hour or so we talk music, films, TV and the death of politics. Opinions are aired and the occasional nonsense displayed. But it’s OK, I'm with friends and it’s what we do. No false face pressure, no need to conform, show desperation or bow to any kind of fucked up social peer pressure. We talk and we laugh, smile and bond.
Here are the questions inquiring minds (me) are dying to know about you:
Situation B:
Such messages will enter into your mind when you start to entertain demons who operates on YouTube and in Facebook groups.
By this, of course, I mean your fantasy world. Do you draw maps? Come up with ridiculous place names? Or do you loosely base locations off of the real world?
Wouldn’t it cost a lot to convert to the metric system? For a person like myself, who doesn’t want to use the metric system, any amount is too much. We can’t get our Department of Highways to take care of our roads. I saw a guy fishing in a pot hole the other day. Well, ok, I lie. But, it would be nice to drive on roads that won’t tear up my tires and shoot everything out of line. I would get pissed if I saw DOH guys taking down the millions of signs everywhere just to change the “miles” to “Kilometers.” It is not cost effective.
“If you’re an educator at a university, college, or K-12 school, now you have an easy way to design and distribute complete courses featuring audio, video, books, and other content,” Apple’s website said Thursday. “And students and lifelong learners can experience your courses for free through a powerful new app for iPad, iPhone, and iPod touch.”
“Oh, you did a great job. I love how you sang with all your heart.”
Let this be the year. Your year.
Some kind of nut. Walnuts or pistachios. Cranberries are always nice. Whatever herb I have at hand (rocket salad is good too). Sugar snaps (if I havn't eaten them all before they hit the pan). Spring onions.
Crisp greens,
Poodles do not shed. Not a doggy hair on the carpet or your clothes will you see. No allergens. This of all things is their greatest asset.
or are we over it already?
You have been delivered from your past – if only you unite yourself with me and let me be your Present and your Future! Leave your past behind, yield yourself to me and let me work in you and through you to bring forth the destiny for which I created you! All you need you do is ask! Ask and you will receive! Do this my Children, do this, for I dearly love you and desire for you to be united with Me in eternity!”
Elizabeth: Write, write, write and keep on writing. Let other writers critique your work. If you don’t like what they have to say have a good cry and then step back and see what criticism is real to you and what is not and go with that.
puts the mind aligned with
I was struck not only by the total and complete devastation in the path of these tornadoes, but also by the poverty, the pain, and the loss of hope that I saw on the faces of many.
Noah, on the other hand, seizes opportunities. After the first cast member said, "walk, don't run" he sprinted past the heavier ladies and started running. And running. And running.
“I am sorry I could not tell you that either, Sam. I have been on loan from the Italian State Police to COCOA for three years now. Angelina and I are part of a team that has been tracking a number of hardline underground chocolate groups for the past five years,” explained Juniper.
I've been not quite my old self for a good portion of that time.
(Mom's birthday is tomorrow)
Rubbish tip – errr…garbage dump? Landfill?
God closed my womb to open up my heart for more children than I could bare on my own in an orphanage on the coast of west Africa. This has brought more joy than giving birth to 10,000 babies! To have Him align my heart with His for the orphan has brought sorrow and suffering. He sent me into a great battle to fight the injustice surrounding their broken lives. I now know Him in ways I NEVER would have had I not taken up my cross and followed Him. This is worth everything I have! Over 3 years into caring for and defending these precious ones I have found that I am less in love with the world and what it has to offer and more devoted to the One who gave His life so these children would know His love.
The New York Rangers Hockey Club is still in the process of rebuilding. We are good. We've built this core right. And our younger skaters have remained surprisingly resilient all season long. I was adamantly opposed to altering this team at the trade deadline. And today, I'm very thankful we didn't do anything hasty or disruptive.
Anytime I go to an exhibition with no or few red sold stickers I feel a sense of sadness. I would like to see all of these paintings, and Landon’s, and mine, out in the light for all to see not languishing in storage. Perhaps now is the time for inspiration. This is the life of art: getting people curious and into visiting galleries and museums, and open studio tours. This could counteract some of the angst in our society. The valuing of human creation; the hand-made, lifts us all.
The Oracles set up their game, and among the pieces they added the game itself. Soon they were involved in its complex patterns, and watched with amusement how the game itself affected the pieces around it.
By sharing your notes online and in real-time, you give your team the opportunity to quickly catch any issues with what you are capturing before it’s too late. Instead of sending out notes that then need to be amended, you can get immediate feedback as you type.
#4
Item #3:Vintage Holiday !!!!
There's just something uttlerly disarming
Psyche in a Dress - Francesca Lia Block
My own life is not a constant bed of roses. But I’m quite happy. I am married to a very wonderful man, who I’ve known since 1978. We became involved in 1986, and moved in together in 1987. Sure we had some problems in the beginning – we both brought baggage from our previous relationships – but we overcame those problems. In 1996, we bought our house off our landlord and paid off the mortgage in 2006. Unfortunately, our roof sprang a leak and 5 years ago, we had to take out a second mortage to do a total tear-off and roof replacement. And a new porch cost us $4,000.00 – oh well. John and I got married in 2002 – and we have been very happy together. He will retire next year, and me – well, I got a few more years to go before I retire. In the meantime, we are getting some needed improvements done on our house – I got some more plants and things just ready to get in the ground in the next couple of weeks – once we get the exterior of our house done, then we got the inside to remodel. We know it’s going to be a lot of hard work – but we are looking forward to it.
Fortunately, the winner, Kelly Fisher, was sitting at my table. Kelly won on the basis of having the most wonderful opening line to her novel and I asked her to jot it down on the back of a business card so that I could share it with you here:
*Sweet pea thinks just like big sis that the best time for these punches is at night when mommy tries to sleep
-Tomatillos
The Acer Iconia Tab A200 comes pre-installed with Clear-fi – Acer’s universal media player that ships on all laptops and tablets. The program enables you to quickly access your movies, music and pictures all with an attractive white sand background image.
After Mr. Bland is fired from his job at a wine shop, the couple are left relatively penniless and the chances that they will ever realize their dream quickly diminish. Their plight is exacerbated by the fact that they live in an apartment building that is a regular site of swinger parties.
Yesterday, early Friday morning, a little 12-year old boy studying in Mont Kiara International School (MKIS) was abducted as he was about to enter the well-secured school compound. As an international school, the majority of its students are mostly kids from the large migrant diaspora in the wealthy suburbs of Mont Kiara. The school is perhaps 3 kilometres from my home, so the kidnapping made my heart skip a beat. Because if this could happen in MKIS, it can happen anywhere, including at my son's government public school, SKBD.
They are all about “People Power”.
I have been considering this for a while. Blogger has its funny ways, and I have two blogs, this one, and well, the other one. I wanted to find a way of combining all of my passions without compromising readership. And the title of this blog was getting on my wick a bit, to be honest. I am a silly changey mindy person, as you know.
me alot of these contest requirements
Pearls - Got them at the NEC last year
Have a great day everyone, and thank you for the Mummy vent,
But head out onto the trails, and find a place where you can only hear the natural world and you've got a great stress reliever, both from the exercise it takes to get there, and the peaceful noise of life in the woods.
Transfer the batter to the prepared pan and bake until a toothpick inserted into the center comes out clean, about 45 minutes. Let cool completely on a rack before running a knife around the edges of the pan to loosen and then turning the cake out of the pan.
08. Leave it 3:54
‘Great! I’ll just shoot off an email to you recording this decision, but before we toast to it’, I proposed, ‘wouldn’t it be better if we tried to improve on the time we spent together every weekend’?
With all that said, I thought I would put together a list of interesting work placements/internships and Apprenticeships I come across, and do this on a weekly basis. You may need to login or register with some of these recruitment websites to apply.
Others say they are devout Judaists, following God as interpreted through various rebbes and tzaddiks in the Chasidic tradition of sorcerers, sages and seers.
I'm making the ever tolerant husband his favourite dinner tonight.
I’ve grave doubts about the usefulness of prison sentences in this situation. At best, we incur the costs of imprisoning offenders for a year or more – Magistrates are already referring many rioters to the Crown Court, because the Magistrates Court cannot impose a sentence of more than six months – and at worst we set petty criminals on a path which to major criminality.
June, 1978: Battle Of The Bands at The Body Shop. Sandwiched between the Hardcore of DOA and the New Wave of Tim Ray and The AV were The Dishrags (having by now jettisoned the "Dee Dee" prefix). They weren't part of the "official" lineup, not having contestant status. Didn't matter. They proved themselves that night that they belonged on the stage.
Funny thing about life, time and our perceptions of it all. I think it's funny that we interact with deadlines. That we judge ourselves by our stage of completion in approximation to deadlines becomes absurd in the face of the finality of most human endeavors. Are we trying to demonstrate foresight? Are we priming ourselves to be the pinnacle of human punctuality? Are we covering our ass? Maybe it's a combination of all.
Both Mike and I have a digital camera and are mad shutterbugs! There are 1000's of photos to sort through, so it may take some time to get a selection up on my blog.
And another bento...
19 year old Wong Li Ya was charged in court today for allegedly procuring two women aged 24 and 20 years for prostitution on Jan 20 last year and March 2010 respectively together with her boyfriend 29 year old Chang Shi Chang like Yap who committed the offence together with her boyfriend Soh Zhi Ren.
Then I thought of another event in recent weeks, the Royal Wedding, and the million strong crowd thronging the streets, a crowd not ethnically mixed, as our dishonest media claimed they were, but massively, overwhelmingly, white. The chattering commentators expressed their horror at the almost total whiteness of the congregation, but dared not admit that same whiteness extended to crowds outside. Where would that leave, inclusive, integrated multicultural Britain?
Fast forward six years to a few days ago. I was sitting in the car waiting for my husband to wrap up a meeting. I remembered that Mother’s Day in the UK had passed about 10 days prior. Feeling a particular prompting to extend a friendly hand toward Janet, I decided to send her a card from me for Mother’s Day, albeit a little late. I kept it in mind through the Disneyland trip and finally yesterday I had a chance to sit down and send it via email. I wrote that I was sorry the card was late, that I had yet to reconcile myself to the UK calendar, but that I hoped her day was great and that I wished her the very best. I hadn’t written her a card since the card that I wrote in 2006. I even ensured that I didn’t write mom or mum in the card.
HEY! Is the third in their 80’s trilogy of LP releases. Originally issued in 1989 on OG Records. 14 Garage/R+B inspired numbers delivered with a patented Savage Punch. Yeah... Everything You have come to expect from THE GRUESOMES!
I was blessed with a big box of fresh corn from the farm and enjoyed processing it.
My father in law grew up in Libya, a country we have heard of so much lately in the news, back in the day when it was an Italian colony. I love hearing stories of his years there, before the new regime confiscated everything they owned, of how he lived as a child on acres and acres of farm land to later move to Tripoli, then a bustling, cosmopolitan city, to finish his schooling and attend University.
Take the latest shit stain to come to the attention of the Big Dollop, a real nugget of a human being who after calling an ambulance to come to the aid of a motorist who collapsed in front of him callously wheel clamped his car and thereafter fleeced him for £150 to release the clamp.
Mrs Bridge has her husband – ‘Mr Bridge’ – and her three children, Ruth, Carolyn and Douglas. Her children threaten Mrs Bridge’s equilibrium, as in the extraordinary scenes where Douglas, like Jocelin in Golding’s The Spire, begins to build an enormous tower from scrap in the family garden: a metaphor for the everyday tragedy of children growing away from their parents’ reach. As Ruth grows away from her – as children must – Mrs Bridge wonders, “Are you mine? Is my daughter mine?”
How bout you all? What's your favorite sweet treat?
Wall/Chair/Bed
“Yeah, I’m tore down now,” he says, his voice laden with gravel and regret. “I apologize, man. I hate to mess you up. I’m as sorry as I can be. We can’t run her like this.”
So, I’m going to self-publish. Please wish me luck.
pound or blend bird chillies , red chillies, shallots, tomato into paste and set a side
The flame from your stage has now spread to the floor
As the hearing slowly moved on, they were up to the part where they were listing her school grades and accomplishments along with her mistakes as she grew up, she let her mind wander. She let her thoughts go back to her childhood when she was just four years old.
The judge presiding over the ceremony was delightful. He regaled us with his sense of humor and anecdotes. As he spoke of valuing diversity in this land of immigrants, his invitational and welcoming tone was very apparent. He quipped that every time Andrew Luck made a touchdown in the future, we should remember that we became citizens on the day that the Indianapolis Colts had drafted him! The swearing-in ceremony was moving. There was a feeling of leaving one thing for another – both things one loves – not unlike the notion in the Indian context, of a bride leaving her family to begin a new life. At that moment I remembered what my brother-in-law had said to my parents at my wedding. He had asked them to look at it as not about ‘losing their daughter’ but ‘gaining a son’. While I feel privileged to now be a citizen in a place I’ve called my home for half of my life, I know my love for the land where I was born will still be a part of me. As my assistant principal later said, “We’ve adopted you, Subha!”
½ cup KRAFT shredded parmesan cheese
Nothing interesting came out of the search and so I finally gave into the macaron frenzy that almost every food blogger is now aware of. I was very very sceptical as to how it would turn out and Shab and Finla totally helped me out with the entire thing. To be honest it was Shabs continuous FB status updates about her awesome mac flavours and finding feet that made me even consider making macs (at some point in my blog life), but it happened sooner than I thought.
i am happy to report that after 9 months, the system is still in place and is working beautifully!
He looks at me for awhile and then nod.
Okay, so prepare yourself for me to talk about my books again. I swear I'm not trying to spam you here on the blog. But if you don't want to read about my promotional stuff for POSSESSION, you can stop reading now.
Their supervisor was a burly foreman called Eric. On hearing my report, he told the boys they were dismissed and asked them for their cash. They emptied their wallets and he counted it up.
Nothing speaks so dramatically about Clint Eastwood's recent and remarkable burst of creativity as a director of awards-worthy films than the appearance of "Invictus," a historical drama that few if any filmmakers could have launched within the studio system. Here is a movie about Nelson Mandela, South Africa after apartheid and, of all things, the sport of rugby. None is high on any list of topics that studio suits crave, which tend more toward vampires and superheroes. Even the title -- that of a Victoria-era poem -- is obscure.
We pass by an old gas station, a car wash, a cemetery. Then the houses begin, clapboard houses spaced thirty or so feet apart. Halloween decorations hang in the windows of most of them. A sidewalk cuts through small yards leading to the front doors. A traffic circle sits in the center of town, and in the middle of it is a statue of a man on horseback holding a sword. Henri stops. We both look at it and laugh, though we’re laughing because we hope no one else with swords ever shows up here. He continues around the circle and once we’re through it, the dashboard GPS system tells us to make a turn. We begin heading west, out of town.
Imagine your students meeting a real fire safety dog!
Manny Caruana highlighted what he and others believed is the need for the agencies involved in the project to take a particularly closer look at all maritime options.
Well, if you have linen napkins and some satin ribbon, you can have this little Army of Easter Rabbits marching across your table, too!!
Cleanse the area with incense or sage. I create sacred space by simply grounding and centering and visualizing an area around myself filled with energy, closed to random or chaotic spirits and open only to those I invite.
When your pie is done, you will have the most delicious, most beautiful UGLY PIE you ever did see!
-I needed to go buy a tile cutter in order to get them into certain shapes and sizes.
I’ll bet university librarians up and down the land will be discussing this over the coming months, while eagerly awaiting the publication of Dame Janet Finch’s report.
Iván Meade - Do you ever get star-struck when meeting these clients for the first time?
The innocent can never last
In October, under pressure from the Federal Communications Commission, U.S. carriers agreed to start alerting customers by text message when they’re getting close to hitting their plan caps on data, phone minutes and text messages. This would allow users to either curb their use for the rest of the month or switch to a higher (and pricier) tier before they incur overage charges.
Society is the poor , the worker , the pensioner , the banker , the manufacturers , the fraudsters , the rich.
"PRAISE THE LORD, O MY SOUL;
Round 4- Adrien Robinson, tight end, Cincinnati
Below is a listing of the Maggie Sottero Styles we will have her for our Trunk Show on March 11 and 12. Please call to make your appointment to try on these incredible wedding gowns and get a sneak preview of the Spring 2011 Collection that will be available in stores in the coming weeks.
* Tunnard owed no fiduciary obligations in relation to the development of a preliminary concept for a new helmet and was not in any event in breach of any such obligation by seeking to raise funds for such a project while still in employment.
Vermicelli – 1 cup
So yes, Raymond Pettibon and Roy Lichtenstein will be most likely be our featured artists next (week).
For the past week, I’ve been listening to and reading the Book of Psalms. Even people who don’t often read the scriptures are familiar with the Psalms because of their beauty. Additionally, the words of David and Asaph which were written thousands of years ago weirdly relate to my everyday life.
All the NTC mills in India except in Tamilnadu were sick and registered with the Board for Industrial and Financial Reconstruction (BIFR). NTC declared in the BIFR that it was possible to revive the NTC mills all over the country with an aggressive modernization proposal, which they submitted such a proposal to the BIFR in 2002. The funds for this revival were to be raised mainly from the sale of mills in Mumbai. The NTC‘s revival plan envisages shutting down 77 of its total of 119 mills in India, and running 22. Out of the 22, 18 are supposed to be run under joint venture, as textile related activity with the private sector.
We don't want him to suffer (and right now he's not at all)...but we're going away in a couple of weeks for a few days and it would be awful if anything were to happen to him while we were away.
And the high school bands! With the girls up front, their flags whipping through the air only a few feet away. The tacky "floats" on trailers hitched to the back of trucks as people yell, "Merry Christmas, ya'll!" And you can't forget the AFJROTC that march more in time than the enlisted Air Force that preceded them. Yes, I giggled over that.
anything else, how much my dad had loved me.
what we've become
This video WILL make you tear up, get pumped up,
